New Mexico, session 2026, HB332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. SEVERANCE TAX BONDS--REAUTHORIZATION AND
REAPPROPRIATION OF PROCEEDS.--For a prior year severance tax
bond appropriation for a capital outlay project as provided
in this act, the legislature may reauthorize or reappropriate
the unexpended balance of the severance tax bond proceeds,
expand or change the project purpose, extend the expenditure
period, change the recipient agency or establish conditions
for the reversion or transfer of the unexpended balance due
to:
A. the inability of a project to use the proceeds
of the severance tax bonds for the purpose originally
authorized by law;
B. the completion of a project without the use of
the appropriated severance tax bond proceeds;
C. unanticipated delays in the need for or
expenditure of the severance tax bond proceeds for the HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 1

purpose originally authorized by law; or
D. required compliance with the federal Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
SECTION 2. SEVERANCE TAX BONDS--REVERSION OF
PROCEEDS.--
A. Except as otherwise provided in another section
of this act:
(1) the unexpended balance from the proceeds
of severance tax bonds issued for a project that has been
reauthorized in this act shall revert to the severance tax
bonding fund:
(a) at the end of the expenditure
period as set forth in this act, if the expenditure period is
changed in this act; or
(b) if the expenditure period is not
changed in this act, pursuant to the time frame set forth in
the law that originally authorized the severance tax bonds or
the time frame set forth in any law that has previously
reauthorized the expenditure of the proceeds, whichever is
later; and
(2) all remaining balances from the proceeds
of severance tax bonds issued for a project that has been
reauthorized in this act shall revert to the severance tax
bonding fund three months after the reversion date for the
unexpended balances. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 2

B. For the purpose of this section, "unexpended
balance" means the remainder of an appropriation after
reserving for unpaid costs and expenses covered by binding
written obligations to third parties.
SECTION 3. GENERAL FUND AND OTHER FUND APPROPRIATIONS--
REVERSIONS.--
A. Except as otherwise provided in another section
of this act:
(1) the unexpended balance of an
appropriation from the general fund or other state fund that
has been changed in this act shall revert:
(a) at the end of the expenditure
period as set forth in this act, if the expenditure period is
changed in this act; or
(b) if the expenditure period is not
changed in this act, pursuant to the time frame set forth in
the law in which the original appropriation was made or the
time frame set forth in any law that has previously changed
the appropriation, whichever is later; and
(2) all remaining balances of an
appropriation from the general fund or other state fund that
has been changed in this act shall revert three months after
the reversion date for the unexpended balance.
B. Except as provided in Subsection C of this
section, the balance of an appropriation made from the HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 3

general fund or other state fund shall revert pursuant to
Subsection A of this section to the originating fund.
C. The balance of an appropriation made from the
general fund or other state fund to the Indian affairs
department or the aging and long-term services department for
a project located on lands of an Indian nation, tribe or
pueblo shall revert pursuant to Subsection A of this section
to the tribal infrastructure project fund.
D. For the purpose of this section, "unexpended
balance" means the remainder of an appropriation after
reserving for unpaid costs and expenses covered by binding
written obligations to third parties.
SECTION 4. LOS OJOS MUTUAL DOMESTIC WATER CONSUMERS'
AND SEWAGE WORKS ASSOCIATION AND BRAZOS MUTUAL DOMESTIC WATER
CONSUMERS ASSOCIATION WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of environment project in Subsection 75 of Section
22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct and
renovate wells in Los Ojos mutual domestic water consumers'
and sewage works association and Brazos mutual domestic water
consumers association in Rio Arriba county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 5. ATRISCO DRIVE CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of transportation project in Subsection 2 of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 4

Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and improve Atrisco drive, including drainage, curb
and gutter and sidewalks, in Bernalillo county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 6. BERNALILLO COUNTY TOWN OF ATRISCO LAND
GRANT-MERCED MONUMENT AND MEMORIAL PLAZA PARK--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local
government division project in Subsection 9 of Section 35 of
Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the time of expenditure was
previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 35 to
acquire land and to plan, design and construct an Atrisco
land grant-merced monument and memorial plaza park in the
Atrisco community in Bernalillo county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 7. ATRISCO VISTA BOULEVARD CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of transportation project in Subsection 3 of
Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire rights of
way for and to plan, design and construct the realignment of
Atrisco Vista boulevard, from Double Eagle airport to paseo
del Norte boulevard NW, including the intersection of Atrisco
Vista boulevard and paseo del Norte boulevard NW, in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 8. ATRISCO VISTA BOULEVARD EXTENSION
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 5

expenditure for the department of transportation project
originally authorized in Subsection 1 of Section 38 of
Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the time of expenditure was
previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 3 to
acquire rights of way for and to plan, design, construct,
extend and improve Atrisco Vista boulevard, including bike
lanes, in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year
2028.
SECTION 9. BERNALILLO COUNTY AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECT
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of transportation project in
Subsection 5 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and equip sanitary sewer, storm
drainage and required road infrastructure for an affordable
housing project at 98th street and Gibson boulevard SW in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 10. BERNALILLO COUNTY SENIOR AFFORDABLE HOUSING
CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO AFFORDABLE HOUSING COMPLEX
CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE AGENCY--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the aging and
long-term services department in Subsection 1 of Section 16
of Chapter 159 of Laws 2025 to acquire and to plan, design
and construct affordable housing complexes for low-to-
moderate-income senior citizens in Bernalillo county shall
not be expended for the original purpose but is appropriated HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 6

to the local government division to acquire property for and
to plan, design, purchase, construct, improve and equip
affordable housing complexes for low-to-moderate-income
residents in Bernalillo county. The time of expenditure is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 11. BERNALILLO COUNTY ALAMEDA DRAIN TRAIL
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 9 of Section 33 of Chapter 159 of Laws 2025 to
plan, design, construct and renovate the Alameda drain trail
in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 12. BERNALILLO COUNTY CENTRO SAVILA BUILDING
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 7 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
purchase a building and to plan, design, construct and
renovate a mental health and suicide prevention facility for
immigrant and refugee families in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 13. BERNALILLO COUNTY FLAMENCO EDUCATION
PROGRAM VEHICLE AND EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL
FUND.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project in Subsection 15 of Section 28 of Chapter 66
of Laws 2024 to purchase, deliver and equip vehicles and
storage containers for a statewide flamenco educational HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 7

program in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year
2028.
SECTION 14. BERNALILLO COUNTY HEALTH CARE SERVICE
PLAN--CHANGE TO HEALTH CARE FACILITY EQUIPMENT AND
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL
FUND.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to the
local government division in Subsection 18 of Section 28 of
Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to plan and design a health care
facility in Bernalillo county shall not be expended for the
original purpose but is changed to purchase and install
equipment and information technology at a health care
facility in Bernalillo county. The time of expenditure is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 15. BERNALILLO COUNTY EAST MOUNTAIN FOOD PANTRY
EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 23 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase and deliver equipment for a food pantry serving low-
income, food-insecure individuals in the East Mountain area
in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 16. BERNALILLO COUNTY PARADISE HILLS LITTLE
LEAGUE GROUNDS AND FACILITY IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local
government division project in Subsection 17 of Section 30 of
Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct, install HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 8

and equip improvements to the facilities and grounds used by
the Paradise Hills little league, including a concrete
entryway, playground, bleachers, shade structures, field and
parking lighting, pavilion, landscaping and walking trails,
in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 17. BERNALILLO COUNTY ROAD TRAFFIC CALMING
INSTALLATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of transportation project in
Subsection 10 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and install traffic calming devices
for roads in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 18. BERNALILLO COUNTY ROAD IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of transportation project in Subsection 7 of
Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and improve county roads in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 19. BERNALILLO COUNTY SHERIFF'S OFFICE INFRARED
CAMERAS PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 36 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase, equip and install color infrared cameras for the
sheriff's office metropolitan air support unit in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 9

SECTION 20. BERNALILLO COUNTY SHERIFF'S DEPARTMENT
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL
FUND.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project in Subsection 37 of Section 28 of Chapter 66
of Laws 2024 to purchase, equip and install information
technology and crime prevention technology for the sheriff's
office in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year
2028.
SECTION 21. BERNALILLO COUNTY SUBSTANCE ABUSE RECOVERY
SERVICE EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The
time of expenditure for the local government division project
in Subsection 40 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase, deliver and equip kitchen appliances, information
technology, furniture and equipment for a substance abuse
recovery program in Bernalillo county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 22. BERNALILLO COUNTY TRAFFIC SIGNALS
REPLACEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of transportation project in
Subsection 12 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, replace, purchase, equip and install
traffic signals for roads in Bernalillo county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 23. BERNALILLO COUNTY VETERANS TRANSITIONAL
HOUSING PURCHASE--CHANGE TO TRANSITIONAL HOUSING HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 10

IMPROVEMENT--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the local government division originally
authorized in Subsection 155 of Section 28 of Chapter 199 of
Laws 2023 and reauthorized in Laws 2025, Chapter 158, Section
14 to purchase and install furnishings and equipment for
transitional housing at the veterans integration centers in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county shall not be expended for
the original or reauthorized purpose but is changed to plan,
design, construct, furnish, equip and improve transitional
housing, including security systems, sidewalks and
landscaping, at the veterans integration centers in
Bernalillo county.
SECTION 24. BERNALILLO COUNTY INDOOR AND OUTDOOR KENNEL
PURCHASE--CHANGE TO VOCATIONAL TRAINING EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--
GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to
the local government division in Subsection 20 of Section 28
of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase, equip and install
indoor and outdoor kennels for a program to assist military
veterans and shelter animals in Bernalillo county shall not
be expended for the original purpose but is changed to
purchase equipment, including food pantry and transport
equipment and animal kenneling and handling systems, for a
vocational training program for veterans in Bernalillo
county.
SECTION 25. CHILILI LAND GRANT-MERCED SKID STEER HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 11

PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 214
of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and
equip a skid steer, including attachments, for the Chilili
land grant-merced in Bernalillo county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 26. CENTRAL NEW MEXICO COMMUNITY COLLEGE
BUILDINGS DEMOLITION--CHANGE TO MAIN CAMPUS IMPROVEMENT--
GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to
the higher education department in Subsection 1 of Section 24
of Chapter 159 of Laws 2025 to demolish and remove existing
facilities, including Ted Chavez hall and the buildings on
the west campus, at central New Mexico community college in
Bernalillo county shall not be expended for the original
purpose but is changed to plan, design, construct, improve
and equip spaces at the main campus in preparation for the
demolition and removal of the west building and Ted Chavez
hall at central New Mexico community college in Bernalillo
county.
SECTION 27. MCMAHON BOULEVARD IMPROVEMENT BERNALILLO
COUNTY--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of transportation project in
Subsection 11 of Section 38 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for
which the time of expenditure was previously extended in Laws
2024, Chapter 65, Section 45 to acquire rights of way and to HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 12

plan, design and construct road, signal and safety
improvements to McMahon boulevard from Rockcliff drive to
Anasazi Ridge avenue and Kayenta street in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 28. QUAIL HOLLOW MUTUAL DOMESTIC WATER USERS
ASSOCIATION WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE
TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the department of
environment project in Subsection 3 of Section 22 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct water system
improvements, including service connections, wells, water
storage systems, repairs to electrical systems and well and
pump house buildings, for the Quail Hollow mutual domestic
water users association in Bernalillo county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 29. QUIET LANE SOUTHWEST RIGHTS OF WAY ROAD AND
DRAINAGE IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the department of transportation
project originally authorized in Subsection 7 of Section 38
of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the time of expenditure
was previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 10
to acquire rights of way and to plan, design and construct
road and storm drainage improvements on Quiet lane SW from
Goff boulevard to the end of the road in the Atrisco
community and for other road projects in house district 14 in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 13

SECTION 30. RIVERSIDE DRIVE SW IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of transportation project in Subsection 20 of
Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire rights of
way and to plan, design, construct, replace and improve the
road and storm drainage along Riverside drive SW between
Nashville avenue and La Vega drive in the Atrisco community
and for other road projects in Bernalillo county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 31. SAN YGNACIO ROAD SW CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of transportation project in Subsection 21 of
Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire rights of
way and to plan, design, construct, replace and improve the
road and storm drainage along San Ygnacio road SW from Pear
drive to Goff boulevard and Tapia boulevard SW from San
Ygnacio road to Goff boulevard in the Atrisco community and
for other road projects in Bernalillo county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 32. ALBUQUERQUE MESA DEL SOL EAST PLAT LIFT
STATION CONSTRUCTION--CLARIFYING PROJECT--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of environment project in Subsection 4 of Section
22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct a
lift station on the east plat of the Mesa del Sol economic HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 14

development hub in Bernalillo county for the Albuquerque-
Bernalillo county water utility authority in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 33. ALBUQUERQUE MESA DEL SOL NORTH PLAT LIFT
STATION CONSTRUCTION--CLARIFICATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE
TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the department of
environment project in Subsection 5 of Section 22 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct a lift station
on the north plat of the Mesa del Sol economic development
hub in Bernalillo county for the Albuquerque-Bernalillo
county water utility authority in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 34. ALBUQUERQUE-BERNALILLO COUNTY WATER UTILITY
AUTHORITY SOUTHSIDE WATER RECLAMATION PLANT OUTFALL
REALIGNMENT PROJECT D--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the department of environment project
in Subsection 2 of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, improve and equip the southside
water reclamation plant outfall realignment, including
additional bosque habitat, siting, trails, riparian
vegetation and root wad revetments along the Rio Grande, for
the Albuquerque-Bernalillo county water utility authority in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 35. ALBUQUERQUE RIO GRANDE STATE PARK
IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE TO MIDDLE RIO GRANDE CONSERVANCY DISTRICT HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 15

RIO GRANDE STATE PARK IMPROVEMENT--GENERAL FUND.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the local
government division in Subsection 162 of Section 28 of
Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to plan, design, construct, equip and
improve areas of the bosque in the Rio Grande Valley state
park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county shall not be
expended for the original purpose but is changed to plan,
design, construct, equip and improve areas of the bosque in
the Rio Grande Valley state park for the middle Rio Grande
conservancy district in Bernalillo county.
SECTION 36. ALBUQUERQUE SOUTHWEST RIO GRANDE BOSQUE
IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE TO MIDDLE RIO GRANDE CONSERVANCY DISTRICT
RIO GRANDE BOSQUE IMPROVEMENT--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the local government division
in Subsection 197 of Section 33 of Chapter 159 of Laws 2025
to plan, design, construct, repair, purchase, restore, equip
and improve areas of the bosque on the west river bank and
south of Central avenue in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county
shall not be expended for the original purpose but is changed
to plan, design, construct, repair, purchase, restore, equip
and improve areas of the bosque on the west river bank and
south of Central avenue for the middle Rio Grande conservancy
district in Bernalillo county.
SECTION 37. TWELFTH STREET AND SAWMILL ROAD
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 16

expenditure for the department of transportation project in
Subsection 1 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, furnish, equip and construct improvements,
including landscaping and lighting, to the intersection of
Twelfth street and Sawmill road in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 38. ALBUQUERQUE AFFORDABLE HOUSING
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 35 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
acquire land and rights of way and to plan, design, construct
and improve affordable housing in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 39. ALBUQUERQUE DESERT HILLS ACQUISITION--
CHANGE TO LAND ACQUISITION FOR AFFORDABLE HOUSING--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the local government division in Subsection
55 of Section 28 of Chapter 199 of Laws 2023 to acquire land
and rights of way and to plan, design, construct, renovate,
equip and furnish Desert Hills as affordable housing in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county shall not be expended for
the original purpose but is changed to acquire land and
rights of way and to plan, design, construct, renovate, equip
and furnish affordable housing in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county. The time of expenditure is extended through fiscal HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 17

year 2028.
SECTION 40. ALBUQUERQUE AFRICAN AMERICAN MUSEUM
BUILDING CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the local government division project
in Subsection 36 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, purchase, install, furnish and equip
an African American museum and cultural center, including
exhibits and information technology, equipment and
infrastructure, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 41. ALBUQUERQUE AFRICAN AMERICAN MUSEUM
FACILITY CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the local government division project
in Subsection 37 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
acquire property and to plan, design, construct, renovate and
equip a facility, including offices, exhibits and archival
space, for the African American museum and cultural center in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 42. ALBUQUERQUE POLICE DEPARTMENT MOBILE
COMMAND UNITS PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time
of expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 64 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase, equip and install mobile community command units
for the police department in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 18

is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 43. ALBUQUERQUE ASIAN AND PACIFIC ISLANDER
COMMUNITY CENTER CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project in Subsection 41 of Section 30 of Chapter 53
of Laws 2022 to acquire land for and to plan, design and
construct a community and resource center for the Asian and
Pacific Islander community in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 44. ALBUQUERQUE BALLOON MUSEUM EXHIBITS
INSTALLATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 44 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, purchase, improve, furnish, equip
and install exhibits, including old exhibits, a balloon
fiesta fiftieth anniversary exhibit and an outdoor youth
exhibit, and to upgrade collections storage for the Abruzzo
international balloon museum in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 45. ALBUQUERQUE BRUSH TRUCK PURCHASE AND
EQUIP--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 73 of
Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and equip
wildfire brush trucks in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 19

SECTION 46. ALBUQUERQUE DISADVANTAGED POPULATIONS
EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 84 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase and equip vehicles and equipment, including
information technology, to support employment and job
creation for disadvantaged populations and seniors in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 47. ALBUQUERQUE EXPLORA MUSEUM CAMPUS
EXPANSION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 62 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and equip the remaining phases of
Explora's cradle to career science, technology, engineering,
art and mathematics learning campus, including the Brillante
early learning center, and to plan, design, construct,
purchase and equip exhibits, furnishings and information
technology equipment for the Explora science center and
children's museum in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 48. ALBUQUERQUE FLAMENCO WORKS DANCE SCHOOL
EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the local government division project
in Subsection 66 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 20

plan, design, construct, install, furnish and equip a
portable stage, including audio and lighting equipment and
information technology, for the Flamenco Works dance school
in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 49. ALBUQUERQUE FOOD DISTRIBUTION EQUIPMENT
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 100
of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and
install equipment for food storage and distribution,
including tractors and trailers, forklifts, forklift
batteries, pallet jacks, electric pallet jacks and pallet
racking, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 50. ALBUQUERQUE FOOD DISTRIBUTION EQUIPMENT
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 2 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
purchase equipment, including tractors and trailers,
forklifts, forklift batteries, pallet jacks, electric pallet
jacks and pallet racking, for emergency food storage and
distribution for Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 51. ALBUQUERQUE HISTORIC BUILDING CONVERSION TO
ARTS FACILITY STUDY--CHANGE TO HISTORIC BUILDING CONVERSION HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 21

TO PUBLIC-USE FACILITY STUDY--CHANGE AGENCY--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the cultural affairs department in
Subsection 1 of Section 21 of Chapter 159 of Laws 2025 for a
feasibility study to develop a historic building near Central
avenue in the southeast area of Albuquerque as an arts and
cultural facility in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county shall
not be expended for the original purpose but is appropriated
to the general services department for a feasibility study to
develop a historic building near Central avenue in the
southeast area of Albuquerque as a public-use facility. The
time of expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 52. ALBUQUERQUE LAW ENFORCEMENT FACILITIES
MODERNIZING RENOVATIONS--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project in Subsection 81 of Section 30 of Chapter 53
of Laws 2022 to renovate, repair, upgrade and otherwise
improve police department facilities in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 53. ALBUQUERQUE LOS TOMASES PARK RENOVATION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 85 of
Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and
construct improvements, including playground renovation,
turf, lighting and landscaping, to Los Tomases park in HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 22

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 54. ALBUQUERQUE LOS VOLCANES SENIOR CENTER
RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the aging and long-term services department
project in Subsection 1 of Section 5 of Chapter 53 of Laws
2022 to plan, design, construct, renovate, equip and furnish
Los Volcanes senior center in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 55. ALBUQUERQUE GEORGE J. MALOOF MEMORIAL AIR
PARK IMPROVEMENTS--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the local government division project
in Subsection 86 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and improve George J. Maloof memorial
air park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 56. ALBUQUERQUE HEALTH CARE DATA SYSTEMS AND
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PURCHASE--CHANGE TO MEDICAL CENTER
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the local government division
originally authorized in Subsection 106 of Section 28 of
Chapter 199 of Laws 2023 and reauthorized in Laws 2024,
Chapter 65, Section 30 and again in Laws 2025, Chapter 158,
Section 37 to purchase, equip, furnish and install
information technology for health care data systems in HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 23

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county shall not be expended for
the original or reauthorized purpose but is changed to plan,
design, construct, purchase, equip and furnish a medical
center in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 57. ALBUQUERQUE MUSEUM EDUCATION CENTER
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 96 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
rehabilitate, plan, design, renovate, construct and improve
the Albuquerque museum, including the museum education
center, educational spaces, offices, a parking lot, heating,
ventilation and air conditioning systems, fire suppression
systems, restrooms, a sculpture garden and the purchase and
installation of equipment, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 58. ALBUQUERQUE WEST SIDE INDOOR SPORTS COMPLEX
CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO NORTHWEST SPORTS COMPLEX
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the local government division
in Subsection 138 of Section 28 of Chapter 199 of Laws 2023
to plan, design, construct, improve, furnish and equip an
indoor sports complex at the Jennifer Riordan spark kindness
sports complex in northwest Albuquerque in Bernalillo county
shall not be expended for the original purpose but is changed HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 24

to plan, design, construct, improve, furnish and equip an
indoor sports complex in northwest Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county. The time of expenditure is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 59. ALBUQUERQUE PETROGLYPH ESTATES PARK
RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 108 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, purchase and install playground
equipment, including associated site work, at Petroglyph
Estates park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 60. ALBUQUERQUE POLICE DEPARTMENT INFORMATION
AND INVESTIGATIVE TECHNOLOGY PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL
FUND.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project in Subsection 147 of Section 28 of Chapter
66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and equip information and
investigative technology, including cameras, drones and
digital investigation, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 61. ALBUQUERQUE PERFORMING VISUAL ARTS AND
EDUCATION CENTER CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project in Subsection 111 of Section 30 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to perform site preparation and to plan, HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 25

design, construct, purchase, renovate, furnish and equip
buildings and grounds, including fencing and infrastructure,
for a performing visual arts and education center in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 62. ALBUQUERQUE RECREATION FACILITY
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 117 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and equip outdoor recreation
facilities, including a splash pad and bicycle recreation
track, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 63. ALBUQUERQUE SPLASH PAD CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE
TO ALBUQUERQUE RECREATION FACILITY CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the local government division in Subsection
55 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, purchase, equip and install splash pads in public
parks in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county shall not be
expended for the original purpose but is changed to plan,
design, construct and equip outdoor recreation facilities,
including a splash pad and bicycle recreation track, in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county. The time of expenditure is
extended through fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 26

SECTION 64. BERNALILLO COUNTY SPLASH PARK
CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO ALBUQUERQUE RECREATION FACILITY
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the local
government division in Subsection 131 of Section 35 of
Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 to plan, design, construct, equip and
furnish a new splash park in Bernalillo county shall not be
expended for the original purpose but is changed to plan,
design, construct and equip outdoor recreation facilities,
including a splash pad and bicycle recreation track, in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county. The time of expenditure is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 65. ALBUQUERQUE ROUTE 66 VISITOR CENTER
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 121 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, expand, furnish and equip
improvements to a visitor center and multi-use trail along
west Central avenue in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 66. ALBUQUERQUE SANTA BARBARA-MARTINEZTOWN
GARDEN IMPROVEMENTS--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the local government division project
in Subsection 122 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and improve community garden spaces HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 27

in the Santa Barbara-Martineztown neighborhood, including
irrigation, community gathering space, storage and
landscaping, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 67. ALBUQUERQUE SAWMILL AND OLD TOWN STREET AND
PEDESTRIAN ROUTE IMPROVEMENTS--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the department of
transportation project in Subsection 28 of Section 36 of
Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire land and rights of way and
to plan, design, construct, demolish, improve, expand and
equip streets and pedestrian and vehicular routes in the
Sawmill and Old Town areas in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 68. ALBUQUERQUE SAWMILL COMMUNITY LAND TRUST
PLAZA RENOVATION--CHANGE TO SAWMILL COMMUNITY OPEN SPACE AREA
RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the local government division
in Subsection 123 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and renovate the plaza on the Sawmill
community land trust in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county
shall not be expended for the original purpose but is changed
to plan, design, construct and renovate the Sawmill community
open space area in Albuquerque in Bernalillo. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 69. ALBUQUERQUE SHOOTING RANGE PARK HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 28

IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 126 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, renovate, upgrade and expand
Shooting Range park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 70. ALBUQUERQUE YOUTH TEMPORARY HOUSING
FACILITY--CHANGE TO YOUTH AND YOUNG ADULT TEMPORARY HOUSING
FACILITY--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the local government division
in Subsection 144 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
purchase, equip and renovate a facility to provide temporary
housing for youth in transition in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county shall not be expended for the original purpose but is
changed to plan, design, construct, renovate, purchase and
equip a facility to provide temporary housing for youth and
young adults in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county. The time
of expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 71. ALBUQUERQUE YOUTH TEMPORARY HOUSING
FACILITY--CHANGE TO YOUTH AND YOUNG ADULT TEMPORARY HOUSING
FACILITY--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the local government division
in Subsection 126 of Section 35 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020
for which the time of expenditure was previously extended in
Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 34 to plan, design, construct, HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 29

renovate, purchase and equip a facility to provide temporary
housing for youth in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county shall
not be expended for the original purpose but is changed to
plan, design, construct, renovate, purchase and equip a
facility to provide temporary housing for youth and young
adults in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 72. BARCELONA ROAD IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of transportation project in Subsection 4 of
Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and
construct drainage and road improvements for Barcelona road
and side streets from the Armijo drain to the Isleta drain in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 73. FOURTH STREET GREAT BLOCKS PROJECT
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of transportation project in
Subsection 31 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, purchase and install improvements,
including pedestrian safety, traffic calming, streetscape,
lighting and signage, on Fourth street SW between Coal avenue
and Barelas road in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 74. BARELAS METROPOLITAN REDEVELOPMENT AREA
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 30

expenditure for the local government division project
originally authorized in Subsection 130 of Section 35 of
Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 and reauthorized in Laws 2024,
Chapter 65, Section 37 to plan, design, construct and improve
the Barelas metropolitan redevelopment area in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 75. BERNALILLO COUNTY ADULT LEARNING CENTER
EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--CHANGE AGENCY--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL
FUND.--The agency for the public education department project
in Subsection 9 of Section 16 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase and install furniture and equipment for a hybrid
adult learning center in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is
changed to the local government division of the department of
finance and administration. The time of expenditure is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 76. BERNALILLO COUNTY ABANDONED PROPERTY
ACQUISITION--CHANGE TO AFFORDABLE HOUSING AND OPEN SPACES
PROPERTY ACQUISITION--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance
of the appropriation to the local government division in
Subsection 19 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase abandoned properties in east central Albuquerque for
use in affordable housing and open space projects in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county shall not be expended for
the original purpose but is changed to purchase properties
for affordable housing and open space projects in Albuquerque HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 31

in Bernalillo county.
SECTION 77. BERNALILLO COUNTY SOUTH VALLEY LITTLE
LEAGUE FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project in Subsection 25 of Section 30 of Chapter 53
of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct, purchase and equip
improvements to facilities used by the South Valley little
league, including fields and drainage, a pedestrian bridge,
trails, sidewalks and parking lots, at Rio Bravo park in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 78. BROADWAY BOULEVARD CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of transportation project in Subsection 32 of
Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire property,
easements and rights of way and to plan, design, construct,
furnish and equip road and pedestrian improvements, including
landscaping, medians, multi-use paths and a protected
signalized pedestrian crossing, on Broadway boulevard NE
between Lomas boulevard and Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. avenue
in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 79. COORS BOULEVARD SAFETY AND PEDESTRIAN
INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS--CLARIFYING LOCATION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The location for the department
of transportation project in Subsection 34 of Section 36 of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 32

Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct safety
and pedestrian improvements, including sidewalks and street
lighting, is on Coors boulevard SW between Central avenue and
Gun Club road in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county. The time
of expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 80. ALBUQUERQUE SINGING ARROW PARK
IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE TO COORS ROAD NORTHWEST MEDIANS
IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE AGENCY--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the local
government division in Subsection 190 of Section 33 of
Chapter 159 of Laws 2025 to plan, design, construct, equip
and improve Singing Arrow park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county shall not be expended for the original purpose but is
appropriated to the department of transportation to plan,
design, construct, equip, repair and improve medians and
median landscaping on Coors road NW in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county. The time of expenditure is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 81. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY METRO
ADMINISTRATION BUILDING CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE
TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the capital program
fund project in Subsection 2 of Section 8 of Chapter 53 of
Laws 2022 to acquire land for and to plan, design, construct,
furnish and equip a new administrative complex for the
department of public safety in Albuquerque in Bernalillo HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 33

county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 82. LEAD AVENUE SE AND COAL AVENUE SE
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of transportation project in
Subsection 36 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct improvements for road
functionality and safety on Lead avenue SE and Coal avenue SE
in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 83. MCMAHON BOULEVARD NW IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of transportation project in Subsection 37 of
Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire land for and
to plan, design, construct and improve McMahon boulevard NW
from Kayenta boulevard NW to Rockcliff drive NW, including
four lanes, sidewalks and street lighting, in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 84. EASTERN PLAINS COUNCIL OF GOVERNMENTS
HOMELESS SHELTER RENOVATION--CHANGE TO MENAUL SCHOOL
COMMERCIAL KITCHEN EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--GENERAL FUND.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the local
government division in Subsection 263 of Section 28 of
Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to plan, design, construct, renovate,
furnish and equip transitional housing for the homeless in
Curry county shall not be expended for the original purpose HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 34

but is changed to purchase and install commercial kitchen
equipment at Menaul school to expand food service capacity in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county. The time of expenditure is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 85. MESA DEL SOL BOULEVARD CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE
TO MESA DEL SOL TOWN CENTER ROADS CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the department of transportation in
Subsection 38 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct a road from the Mesa del Sol
interchange to the Mesa del Sol town center in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county shall not be expended for the original
purpose but is changed to plan, design and construct roads in
the Mesa del Sol town center in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county. The time of expenditure is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 86. TRANSITIONAL HOUSING RENOVATION--CHANGE
AGENCY--GENERAL FUND.--The agency for the mortgage finance
authority project originally authorized in Section 36 of
Chapter 159 of Laws 2025 to plan, design, construct and
renovate a former medical and dental clinic for use as
affordable and transitional housing in the International
district in Albuquerque is changed to the local government
division of the department of finance and administration for
the mortgage finance authority. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 35

SECTION 87. NATIONAL HISPANIC CULTURAL CENTER
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the cultural affairs department project in
Subsection 2 of Section 9 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan,
design, construct, repair and improve exhibits and facilities
at the national Hispanic cultural center in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 88. ALBUQUERQUE PASEO DEL NORTE AND UNSER
BOULEVARD EXPANSION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the department of transportation
project in Subsection 42 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws
2022 to acquire rights of way and to plan, design, construct,
landscape and improve roads, including Unser boulevard and
paseo del Norte, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 89. SOUTHWESTERN INDIAN POLYTECHNIC INSTITUTE
WATER LINE AND ROOF REPLACEMENT--CHANGE TO IMPROVE CAMPUS
INFRASTRUCTURE--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the higher
education department in Subsection 3 of Section 37 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct, renovate, improve
and replace water lines and roofs campuswide at the
southwestern Indian polytechnic institute in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county shall not be expended for the original
purpose but is changed to plan, design, construct and improve HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 36

campus infrastructure, including the replacement and
rehabilitation of water lines and associated asbestos
abatement, structural safety enhancements, improvements to
pedestrian pathways and related site and utility
improvements, at the southwestern Indian polytechnic
institute in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 90. SUNSET ROAD SW CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of transportation project in Subsection 22 of
Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire rights of
way and to plan, design, construct, replace and improve the
road and storm drainage along Sunset road SW from Gonzales
road to Neetsie drive in the Atrisco community and for other
road projects in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 91. TIERRA ADENTRO OF NEW MEXICO VEHICLE
PURCHASE--CHANGE TO VEHICLE PURCHASE AND INFRASTRUCTURE
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the public education
department in Subsection 22 of Section 25 of Chapter 159 of
Laws 2025 to purchase and equip a vehicle and trailer for
Tierra Adentro of New Mexico charter school in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county shall not be expended for the original
purpose but is changed to purchase and equip a vehicle and HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 37

trailer and to plan, design, construct, equip and improve
buildings and grounds, infrastructure and security systems at
the Tierra Adentro of New Mexico charter school in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county. The time of expenditure is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 92. ALBUQUERQUE TRAMWAY BOULEVARD IMPROVEMENT--
CHANGE TO TRAMWAY BOULEVARD LANDSCAPING IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE
AGENCY--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the department of
transportation in Subsection 23 of Section 36 of Chapter 53
of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct improvements on
Tramway boulevard, including landscaping and the adjoining
Tramway recreational trail, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county shall not be expended for the original purpose but is
appropriated to the local government division of the
department of finance and administration to plan, design,
purchase and equip improvements to Tramway boulevard,
including landscaping and trails, in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county. The time of expenditure is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 93. TRAMWAY ROAD LANDSCAPE CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE
TO PURCHASE, EQUIP AND IMPROVE LANDSCAPING--CHANGE AGENCY--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of
the appropriation to the department of transportation in
Subsection 43 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 38

plan, design, construct and upgrade landscaping on Tramway
road from United States interstate highway I-40 to Manitoba
avenue in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county shall not be
expended for the original purpose but is appropriated to the
local government division of the department of finance and
administration to plan, design, purchase, equip, install and
improve landscaping on Tramway road NE from United States
interstate highway I-40 to Manitoba drive in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county. The time of expenditure is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 94. UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO QUANTUM MATERIALS
AND TECHNOLOGIES LABORATORY RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
university of New Mexico project in Subsection 11 of Section
43 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct,
purchase, furnish, equip, install and renovate the quantum
materials and technologies laboratory at the center for high
technology materials at the university of New Mexico in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 95. UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO SCHOOL OF
ENGINEERING SAFETY INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
university of New Mexico project in Subsection 13 of Section
43 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, purchase, HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 39

renovate, install and equip safety and security
infrastructure in the school of engineering buildings at the
university of New Mexico in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county
is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 96. ALICE KING COMMUNITY SCHOOL FACILITY
RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the public education department project in
Subsection 37 of Section 18 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, renovate and equip classrooms to
improve the acoustics at Alice King community school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 97. EAST MOUNTAIN HIGH SCHOOL EQUIPMENT
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure
for the public education department project in Subsection 54
of Section 16 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and
install meals equipment and other equipment at East Mountain
high school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 98. RIO GRANDE HIGH SCHOOL BUILDING AND GROUNDS
RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the public education department project in
Subsection 120 of Section 18 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and renovate the grounds, parking
lots and bus lane areas, including fencing, resurfacing, HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 40

striping, shade structures, drainage improvements, traffic
signs, landscaping and the purchase and installation of
related equipment, at Rio Grande high school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 99. RIO GRANDE HIGH SCHOOL GYMNASIUM
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the public education department project in
Subsection 25 of Section 18 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, renovate, purchase and install
gymnasium equipment, including furniture, carpeting, fitness
equipment, sound and lighting and signage, at Rio Grande high
school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 100. SUNSET VIEW ELEMENTARY SCHOOL OUTDOOR
CLASSROOM CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the public education
department project in Subsection 128 of Section 18 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct, purchase, equip
and furnish infrastructure, shade structures, benches and
landscaping related to an outdoor classroom, including
equipment and infrastructure needed for wi-fi connectivity
for outdoor learning spaces, at Sunset View elementary school
in the Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 41

SECTION 101. CHILILI LAND GRANT-MERCED FIRE DEPARTMENT
BUILDING CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO FIRE DEPARTMENT AND
MULTIPURPOSE FACILITY IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to the
local government division in Subsection 30 of Section 30 of
Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct, furnish
and equip a fire department building for the Chilili land
grant-merced in Bernalillo county shall not be expended for
the original purpose but is changed to plan, design,
construct, furnish, equip and improve a fire department and
multipurpose facility for the Chilili land grant-merced in
Bernalillo county. The time of expenditure is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 102. PUEBLO OF ISLETA SOLID WASTE TRANSFER
STATION IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the Indian affairs department project
in Subsection 1 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct upgrades to the solid waste
transfer facility, including electrical lines and extension
of utility lines, for the Pueblo of Isleta in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 103. PINE VIEW ROAD IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of transportation project in Subsection 45 of
Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 42

construct road improvements, including Pine View road, in
Tijeras in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year
2028.
SECTION 104. TIJERAS HYDRO EXCAVATION TRUCK AND
SNOWPLOW PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 218 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase and equip vehicles, including hydro excavation
trucks, snowplows and spreader attachments, for Tijeras in
Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 105. TIJERAS VETERANS' MEMORIAL RENOVATION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 151
of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, renovate and repair a veterans' memorial in
Tijeras in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal year
2028.
SECTION 106. TIJERAS WELL CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO
TIJERAS WATER AND WASTEWATER SYSTEMS IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the department of environment originally
authorized in Subsection 5 of Section 26 of Chapter 81 of
Laws 2020 and reauthorized in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section
51 to plan, design and construct a third well and related
infrastructure in Tijeras in Bernalillo county that may HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 43

include planning, designing and constructing a storage tank
shall not be expended for the original or reauthorized
purpose but is changed to plan, design, construct and improve
water and wastewater systems and related infrastructure in
Tijeras in Bernalillo county. The time of expenditure is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 107. TIJERAS WASTEWATER SYSTEM CONSTRUCTION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the department of environment project in Subsection 10 of
Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and
construct a wastewater system for Tijeras in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 108. TO'HAJIILEE CHAPTER BATHROOM
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 2 of Section 47 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2024 to
plan, design and construct bathroom additions and renovations
in the To'hajiilee chapter of the Navajo Nation in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 109. TO'HAJIILEE CHAPTER BATHROOM
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 4 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct bathroom additions and renovations
in the To'hajiilee chapter of the Navajo Nation in Bernalillo HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 44

county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 110. TO'HAJIILEE CHAPTER POWER LINE EXTENSION--
EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure for the
Indian affairs department project in Subsection 4 of Section
70 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the time of
expenditure was previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65,
Section 123 to plan, design, construct and extend a power
line at Platero's community in the To'hajiilee chapter of the
Navajo Nation in Bernalillo county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 111. RESERVE FIRE DEPARTMENT EXPANSION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
local government division project in Subsection 156 of
Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, expand, improve, equip and furnish fire department
buildings and facilities in Reserve in Catron county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 112. CHAVES COUNTY ACCESSIBLE VANS PURCHASE--
CHANGE TO COUNTY DEPARTMENT VEHICLES PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--
GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to
the local government division in Subsection 382 of Section 28
of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and equip fully
accessible vans for the southeast New Mexico veterans
transportation network in Chaves, Lea and Eddy counties shall
not be expended for the original purpose but is changed to HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 45

purchase and equip vehicles for county departments in Chaves
county. The time of expenditure is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 113. HAGERMAN MUNICIPAL SCHOOL DISTRICT
ADMINISTRATIVE BUILDING ROOF REPLACEMENT--CHANGE TO FOOTBALL
FIELD IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the public education
department in Subsection 157 of Section 16 of Chapter 66 of
Laws 2024 for which the purpose was expanded in Laws 2025,
Chapter 158, Section 93 shall not be expended for the
original or reauthorized purpose but is changed to plan,
design, construct and improve the football field, including
security fencing, in the Hagerman municipal school district
in Chaves county. The time of expenditure is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 114. DEXTER MAINTENANCE TRUCKS PURCHASE--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure for the local
government division project in Subsection 227 of Section 28
of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and equip maintenance
trucks in Dexter in Chaves county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 115. ROSWELL INTERNATIONAL AIR CENTER
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 161 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 46

plan, design and construct hangars and infrastructure
improvements at the Roswell international air center in
Chaves county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 116. ROSWELL MUSEUM PHASE 1 RENOVATION--EXPAND
PURPOSE--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The local
government division project in Subsection 168 of Section 30
of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct,
furnish and equip phase 1 of the internal modification and
upgrades at the Roswell museum and art center in Roswell in
Chaves county may include flood remediation and recovery.
The time of expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 117. ROSWELL POLICE DEPARTMENT WASTEWATER
SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE TO POLICE DEPARTMENT FACILITY
IMPROVEMENT--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the local government division in Subsection
245 of Section 33 of Chapter 159 of Laws 2025 to plan,
design, construct and equip wastewater system improvements
for the police department in Roswell in Chaves county shall
not be expended for the original purpose but is changed to
plan, design, construct, improve and equip police department
facilities in Roswell in Chaves county.
SECTION 118. ROSWELL CHAPARRAL SKEET FACILITY
IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE TO ROSWELL SOUTHEAST REGION SHOOTING
RANGE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of
the appropriation to the public education department HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 47

originally authorized in Subsection 156 of Section 16 of
Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 and reauthorized in Laws 2025,
Chapter 158, Section 94 to the local government division to
purchase equipment and to plan, design, construct and upgrade
facilities, technology and equipment at the Roswell Chaparral
skeet club shooting range in Roswell in Chaves county shall
not be expended for the original or reauthorized purpose but
is changed to purchase equipment and to plan, design,
construct and renovate facilities for the Roswell southeast
region shooting range in Roswell in Chaves county. The time
of expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 119. RAMAH CHAPTER EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES
SUBSTATION CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO RAMAH NAVAJO SCHOOL BOARD
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the local government division
originally authorized in Subsection 110 of Section 70 of
Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 and reauthorized in Laws 2024,
Chapter 65, Section 56 to plan, design, construct, furnish
and equip an emergency medical services substation for the
Ramah chapter of the Navajo Nation in Cibola county shall not
be expended for the original or reauthorized purpose but is
changed to plan, design and construct an emergency medical
services substation, including a helipad, for the Ramah
Navajo school board in Cibola county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 48

SECTION 120. SAN MATEO ACEQUIA ASSOCIATION DITCH
IMPROVEMENTS--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the interstate stream commission project in
Subsection 3 of Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, repair, furnish and equip ditch
improvements, including infrastructure, pipes and headgates,
for the San Mateo acequia association in Cibola county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 121. PUEBLO OF LAGUNA K'AWAIKA LIBRARY
RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 8 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip the
K'awaika library in the Pueblo of Laguna in Cibola county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 122. RAMAH CHAPTER TRUCK PURCHASE--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure for the Indian
affairs department project in Subsection 13 of Section 25 of
Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and equip a truck for the
Ramah chapter of the Navajo Nation in Cibola county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 123. RAMAH CHAPTER VEHICLE PURCHASE--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
Indian affairs department project in Subsection 14 of Section
25 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and equip vehicles HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 49

for the Ramah chapter of the Navajo Nation in Cibola county
is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 124. SUGARITE CANYON STATE PARK VISITOR CENTER
CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO ACQUIRE BUCK RIDGE RANCH--GENERAL
FUND.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to the
local government division in Subsection 263 of Section 33 of
Chapter 159 of Laws 2025 to plan, design and construct a
visitor center at Sugarite Canyon state park for Raton in
Colfax county shall not be expended for the original purpose
but is changed to acquire Buck Ridge ranch near Raton in
Colfax county.
SECTION 125. CLOVIS FOOD BANK BUILDING RENOVATION--
CHANGE TO FOOD BANK FACILITY IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--
GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to
the local government division in Subsection 266 of Section 33
of Chapter 159 of Laws 2025 to replace the roof and gutter at
a food bank in Clovis in Curry county shall not be expended
for the original purpose but is changed to plan, design,
construct, improve and equip a food bank facility, including
paving and fencing, in Clovis in Curry county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 126. CURRY COUNTY RECREATION COMPLEX
CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO NED HOUK MEMORIAL PARK IMPROVEMENTS--
EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the local government division in Subsection HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 50

192 of Section 28 of Chapter 199 of Laws 2023 to plan, design
and construct a recreation and sports complex in Curry county
shall not be expended for the original purpose but is changed
to plan, design, construct and equip playgrounds, sidewalks,
shelters, lighting and benches at Ned Houk memorial park in
Clovis in Curry county. The time of expenditure is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 127. CURRY COUNTY RECREATION COMPLEX
CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO CLOVIS NED HOUK MEMORIAL PARK
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the local government division
in Subsection 260 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
plan, design, construct and equip a recreation and sports
complex in Curry county shall not be expended for the
original purpose but is changed to plan, design, construct
and equip playgrounds, sidewalks, shelters, lighting and
benches at Ned Houk memorial park in Clovis in Curry county.
The time of expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 128. EASTERN PLAINS COUNCIL OF GOVERNMENTS
BUILDING SECURITY IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE TO BUILDING
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the local
government division in Subsection 192 of Section 30 of
Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct, purchase,
equip and install security improvements to the eastern plains HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 51

council of governments office building in Clovis in Curry
county shall not be expended for the original purpose but is
changed to plan, design, construct and improve the eastern
plains council of governments office building in Clovis in
Curry county. The time of expenditure is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 129. GRADY PARK RESTROOM AND LIGHTING
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 193 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct restrooms and to purchase and
install lighting at a park in Grady in Curry county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 130. ALTO DE LAS FLORES MUTUAL DOMESTIC WATER
CONSUMERS ASSOCIATION ADMINISTRATION BUILDING CONSTRUCTION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the department of environment project in Subsection 20 of
Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire land for and
to plan, design, purchase, renovate, construct, furnish and
equip a building, including building relocation, for the Alto
de las Flores mutual domestic water consumers association in
Dona Ana county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 131. DONA ANA COUNTY BRAHMAN DIVERSION CHANNEL
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the office of the state engineer project in HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 52

Subsection 1 of Section 21 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, acquire, construct and equip a flood control
structure to convey surface water runoff to the west to
Isaack lake in Dona Ana county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 132. DONA ANA COUNTY DOMESTIC VIOLENCE SHELTER
CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO DOMESTIC VIOLENCE SHELTER LAND
ACQUISITION AND CONSTRUCTION--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the local government division
in Subsection 294 of Section 33 of Chapter 159 of Laws 2025
to plan, design and construct a domestic violence shelter in
Las Cruces in Dona Ana county shall not be expended for the
original purpose but is changed to acquire land for and to
plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip a
domestic violence shelter in Las Cruces in Dona Ana county.
SECTION 133. DONA ANA COUNTY FLOOD CONTROL
IMPROVEMENTS--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of transportation project in
Subsection 52 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
acquire land, easements and rights of way for and to plan,
design, construct and equip drainage improvements throughout
the Dona Ana area in Dona Ana county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 134. DONA ANA COUNTY MAGISTRATE COURT PLAN--
EXPAND PURPOSE--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 53

administrative office of the courts project in Subsection 2
of Section 4 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the time of
expenditure was previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65,
Section 69 to plan, design and construct a magistrate court
building in Anthony in Dona Ana county may include the
acquisition of property. The time of expenditure is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 135. DONA ANA COUNTY DELORES C. WRIGHT PARK
SPLASH PADS CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project in Subsection 217 of Section 30 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct and equip splash
pads, including landscaping, benches, fencing, lighting,
sidewalks, parking lot and a gray-water septic tank with pump
for irrigation, at Delores C. Wright memorial park in
Chaparral in Dona Ana county is extended through fiscal year
2028.
SECTION 136. DONA ANA COUNTY DE LA O VISITOR'S CENTER
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 201 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, purchase and install improvements to
the De La O visitor's center in Dona Ana county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 137. DONA ANA COUNTY SOLAR LIGHT CONSTRUCTION-- HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 54

EXPAND PURPOSE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The department of
transportation project in Subsection 45 of Section 39 of
Chapter 159 of Laws 2025 to plan, design, construct, purchase
and equip solar lighting and street signage in Dona Ana
county may include traffic calming devices. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 138. LAS CRUCES SOUTH CENTRAL SOLID WASTE
AUTHORITY RECYCLING FACILITY UPGRADE--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE
TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the department of
environment project in Subsection 26 of Section 22 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct, upgrade and equip
the south central solid waste authority recycling center,
including a materials recovery sorting line, for Las Cruces
in Dona Ana county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 139. LAS CRUCES SKATE PARK CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
local government division project in Subsection 231 of
Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, furnish, equip and install improvements to skate
parks in Las Cruces in Dona Ana county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 140. LAS CRUCES SKATE PARK RENOVATION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
local government division project in Subsection 219 of
Section 35 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the time of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 55

expenditure was previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65,
Section 82 to plan, design, construct, renovate and equip the
skate park in Las Cruces in Dona Ana county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 141. LAS CRUCES TRANSFER STATION CONSTRUCTION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the department of environment project in Subsection 27 of
Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and equip a south central solid waste authority
transfer and recycling facility for Las Cruces in Dona Ana
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 142. LOWER RIO GRANDE PUBLIC WATER WORKS
AUTHORITY OFFICE BUILDING REPLACEMENT--EXPAND PURPOSE--
GENERAL FUND.--The local government division project in
Subsection 302 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
plan, design, demolish, replace and construct an office
building for the lower Rio Grande public water works
authority in Rincon in Dona Ana county may include
acquisition of land, real property, easements and rights of
way.
SECTION 143. BORDER AUTHORITY PARKING IMPROVEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the border authority project in Subsection 1 of Section 7
of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct
parking lot upgrades and improvements to border authority HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 56

facilities in Santa Teresa in Dona Ana county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 144. JEFFERSON MONTESSORI ACADEMY IMPROVEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the public education department project in Subsection 157
of Section 18 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, renovate and equip heating, ventilation and air
conditioning systems for classrooms at Jefferson Montessori
academy in the Carlsbad municipal school district in Carlsbad
in Eddy county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 145. JEFFERSON MONTESSORI ACADEMY SECURITY
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the public education department project in
Subsection 159 of Section 18 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, renovate and equip Jefferson
Montessori academy, including related security technology
upgrades, exterior doors, keycard entry and automatic
locking, in the Carlsbad municipal school district in
Carlsbad in Eddy county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 146. LOVING WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of environment project in Subsection 37 of Section
22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct
water system improvements in Loving in Eddy county is
extended through fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 57

SECTION 147. CASAS ADOBES MUTUAL DOMESTIC WATER
CONSUMERS ASSOCIATION BACKHOE PURCHASE AND WATER SYSTEM
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the department of environment project in
Subsection 49 of Section 19 of Chapter 199 of Laws 2023 to
purchase and equip a backhoe for the Casas Adobes mutual
domestic water consumers association in Grant county and
reauthorized in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 91 to include
planning, designing and constructing water system
improvements and the purchase and installation of a
supervisory control and data acquisition system for that
association in Grant county is extended through fiscal year
2028.
SECTION 148. GRANT COUNTY BATAAN MEMORIAL PARK
IMPROVEMENTS--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 239 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, equip and install improvements to
Bataan memorial park in Grant county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 149. GRANT COUNTY CRISIS INTERVENTION FACILITY
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 240 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, equip and furnish a crisis HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 58

intervention facility in Grant county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 150. ALDO LEOPOLD CHARTER SCHOOL BUILDINGS AND
GROUNDS CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the public education department
project in Subsection 163 of Section 18 of Chapter 53 of Laws
2022 to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip
improvements, including outdoor classrooms, to the buildings
and grounds at Aldo Leopold charter school in Silver City in
Grant county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 151. WESTERN NEW MEXICO UNIVERSITY EARLY
CHILDHOOD DEVELOPMENT CENTER CONSTRUCTION--EXPAND PURPOSE--
GENERAL FUND.--The western New Mexico university project in
Subsection 2 of Section 41 of Chapter 199 of Laws 2023 to
plan, design, construct and equip an early childhood
development center building at western New Mexico university
in Silver City in Grant county may include hazard abatement
and purchase of the center.
SECTION 152. ANTON CHICO LAND GRANT-MERCED ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT CENTER RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project in Subsection 254 of Section 30 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, demolish, construct,
renovate, repair, equip and furnish the Anton Chico economic
development center, including replacing and repairing HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 59

plumbing, heating, ventilation and air conditioning systems
and the purchase and installation of locks and security
systems, for the Anton Chico land grant-merced in Anton Chico
in Guadalupe county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 153. GUADALUPE COUNTY MAGISTRATE COURT FURNISH
AND EQUIP--EXPAND PURPOSE--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The administrative office of the courts project in
Subsection 1 of Section 4 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan,
design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip a magistrate
court in Santa Rosa in Guadalupe county may include the
acquisition of property. The time of expenditure is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 154. MOSQUERO WATER SYSTEM LAND ACQUISITION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the department of environment project in Subsection 44 of
Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire property,
including wells, for a water system for Mosquero in Harding
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 155. HARDING COUNTY FAIRGROUNDS IMPROVEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 258
of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, renovate and equip the Harding county fairgrounds
in Roy in Harding county is extended through fiscal year
2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 60

SECTION 156. EUNICE RODEO ARENA CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO
RODEO ARENA AND ATHLETIC FIELDS CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--
GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to
the local government division in Subsection 291 of Section 28
of Chapter 199 of Laws 2023 to plan, design, construct,
furnish and equip a rodeo arena at the Stephens lake property
in Eunice in Lea county shall not be expended for the
original purpose but is changed to plan, design, construct,
renovate, demolish, furnish and equip a rodeo arena and
multipurpose athletic fields, including sidewalks, parking
and landscaping, in Eunice in Lea county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 157. EUNICE RODEO ARENA CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO
RODEO ARENA AND ATHLETIC FIELDS CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--
GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to
the local government division in Subsection 342 of Section 28
of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to plan, design, construct,
furnish and equip a rodeo arena in Eunice in Lea county shall
not be expended for the original purpose but is changed to
plan, design, construct, renovate, demolish, furnish and
equip a rodeo arena and multipurpose athletic fields,
including sidewalks, parking and landscaping, in Eunice in
Lea county. The time of expenditure is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 158. EUNICE RODEO ARENA CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 61

RODEO ARENA AND ATHLETIC FIELDS CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the local government division originally
authorized in Subsection 248 of Section 35 of Chapter 81 of
Laws 2020 for which the time of expenditure was previously
extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 95 to plan,
design, construct and furnish a covered rodeo arena,
including a recreational vehicle park, landscaping, lighting,
sidewalks, parking and fencing, in Eunice in Lea county shall
not be expended for the original purpose but is changed to
plan, design, construct, renovate, demolish, furnish and
equip a rodeo arena and multipurpose athletic fields,
including sidewalks, parking and landscaping, in Eunice in
Lea county. The time of expenditure is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 159. EUNICE RODEO ARENA CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO
RODEO ARENA AND ATHLETIC FIELDS IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the local government division originally
authorized in Subsection 220 of Section 29 of Chapter 138 of
Laws 2021 and reauthorized in Laws 2022, Chapter 52, Section
62 and again in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 94 to plan,
design, construct and furnish a covered rodeo arena,
including a recreational vehicle park, landscaping, lighting,
sidewalks, parking and fencing, in Eunice in Lea county shall HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 62

not be expended for the original or reauthorized purpose but
is changed to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and
equip athletic fields and a rodeo arena, including lighting,
fencing, sidewalks, parking and landscaping, in Eunice in Lea
county. The time of expenditure is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 160. EUNICE RODEO ARENA CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO
STEPHENS LAKE RECREATION IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE
TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to
the local government division in Subsection 265 of Section 30
of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct,
furnish and equip a rodeo arena in Eunice in Lea county shall
not be expended for the original purpose but is changed to
plan, design, construct, demolish, improve, equip and furnish
recreation areas and facilities at Stephens lake, including
trails, restrooms and playgrounds, in Eunice in Lea county.
The time of expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 161. HOBBS HAZARDOUS MATERIALS RESCUE VEHICLE
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 343
of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and
equip heavy rescue hazardous material vehicles in Hobbs in
Lea county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 162. JOE HARVEY BOULEVARD AND NORTH GRIMES
STREET SEWER MAIN CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 63

BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the department of
transportation project in Subsection 60 of Section 36 of
Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, replace and
construct a wastewater system, including the sewer main and
road repair and restoration, on Joe Harvey boulevard, from
Central drive to north Grimes street, and on north Grimes
street, from Joe Harvey boulevard to west Millen drive, in
Hobbs in Lea county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 163. LEA COUNTY HISTORIC COURTHOUSE
RENOVATION--CHANGE TO LEA COUNTY BUILDINGS IMPROVEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of
the appropriation to the local government division in
Subsection 268 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, renovate, equip and furnish
improvements to the historic courthouse in Lovington in Lea
county shall not be expended for the original purpose but is
changed to plan, design, construct, renovate, equip and
furnish improvements to Lea county buildings in Lovington in
Lea county. The time of expenditure is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 164. LEA COUNTY COURTHOUSE RENOVATION--CHANGE
TO LEA COUNTY BUILDINGS IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE
TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to
the local government division originally authorized in
Subsection 251 of Section 35 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 and HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 64

reauthorized in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 99 to plan,
design, construct, purchase, equip and furnish renovations to
the historic county courthouse in Lovington in Lea county
shall not be expended for the original or reauthorized
purpose but is changed to plan, design, construct, renovate,
equip and furnish improvements to Lea county buildings in
Lovington in Lea county. The time of expenditure is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 165. RUIDOSO DOWNS HUBBARD MUSEUM REPAIRS--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 277
of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, repair and renovate the Hubbard museum of the
American west in Ruidoso Downs in Lincoln county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 166. SAN PATRICIO COMMUNITY DITCH
IMPROVEMENTS--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the interstate stream commission project in
Subsection 6 of Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, repair and construct improvements, including a
concrete foundation, a dam, diversion channels and gates, to
the San Patricio community ditch in San Patricio in Lincoln
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 167. CARRIZOZO WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 65

department of environment project in Subsection 38 of Section
26 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the time of
expenditure was previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65,
Section 104 to plan, design and construct water system
improvements in Carrizozo in Lincoln county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 168. CARRIZOZO WATER SYSTEM UPGRADE--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of environment project in Subsection 46 of Section
22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct
water system improvements in Carrizozo in Lincoln county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 169. HONDO VALLEY PUBLIC SCHOOL DISTRICT ACCESS
ROAD AND WATER SYSTEM CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE
TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the public education
department project in Subsection 169 of Section 18 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct access roads
and water system improvements, including site preparation,
the purchase and installation of a water tank, valves,
gauges, connection, plumbing, security fencing and tie-ins,
for schools in the Hondo Valley public school district in
Lincoln county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 170. EASTERN NEW MEXICO UNIVERSITY-RUIDOSO
BUILDING PURCHASE--CHANGE TO RESTROOMS REPAIR--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 66

appropriation to the board of regents of eastern New Mexico
university in Subsection 7 of Section 38 of Chapter 53 of
Laws 2022 to purchase, plan, design, construct, renovate,
equip and furnish a building for the Ruidoso branch campus of
eastern New Mexico university in Lincoln county shall not be
expended for the original purpose but is changed to plan,
design, construct, repair and equip restrooms in the 100 wing
of the Ruidoso branch campus of eastern New Mexico university
in Lincoln county. The time of expenditure is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 171. FORT SILL APACHE TRIBE CULTURAL FACILITY
DESIGN--EXPAND PURPOSE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The
Indian affairs department project in Subsection 15 of Section
25 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to plan and design an indoor
and outdoor cultural activity facility for the Fort Sill
Apache Tribe in Luna county may include construction and the
purchase of equipment and furnishings. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 172. WESTERN NEW MEXICO UNIVERSITY CARBON
NEUTRAL CAMPUS DEVELOPMENT--EXPAND PURPOSE--GENERAL
FUND.--The western New Mexico university project in
Subsection 1 of Section 41 of Chapter 199 of Laws 2023 to
plan, design, demolish, construct and improve renewable
energy and road systems for a carbon-neutral campus,
including electric vehicle charging stations, landscaping and HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 67

associated infrastructure, at western New Mexico university
in Silver City in Grant county may include the branch campus
in Deming in Luna county.
SECTION 173. FORT DEFIANCE CHAPTER MULTIPURPOSE
BUILDING PLAN--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 15 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct a multipurpose building for the
Fort Defiance chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county
is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 174. FRANCISCO POND ROAD BRIDGE IMPROVEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the Indian affairs department project in Subsection 16 of
Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and improve a bridge on Francisco Pond road in the
Rock Springs chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county
is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 175. MANUELITO CHAPTER POWER LINE AND HOUSE
WIRING CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 29 of Section 70 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for
which the time of expenditure was previously extended in Laws
2024, Chapter 65, Section 118 to conduct archaeological and
environmental studies and to plan, design and construct power
lines and house wiring in the Manuelito chapter of the Navajo HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 68

Nation in McKinley county is extended through fiscal year
2028.
SECTION 176. MCKINLEY COUNTY HOSPITAL BUILDINGS AND
INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project originally authorized in Subsection 288 of
Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 and reauthorized in
Laws 2023, Chapter 203, Section 130 to plan, design,
construct and equip building improvements and infrastructure
at Rehoboth McKinley Christian hospital, emergency room
entrance, clinics and centers, including the birthing unit,
in McKinley county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 177. NAVAJO CODE TALKERS MUSEUM CONSTRUCTION--
CLARIFY LOCATION--CHANGE AGENCY--GENERAL FUND.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the Indian affairs
department in Subsection 18 of Section 25 of Chapter 199 of
Laws 2023 and reauthorized in Laws 2025, Chapter 158, Section
213 to acquire property and to plan, design, construct,
furnish and equip a Navajo code talkers museum for the Navajo
Nation shall not be expended for the original or reauthorized
purpose but is appropriated to the local government division
of the department of finance and administration to acquire
property and to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a
Navajo code talkers museum for the Navajo Nation in McKinley
county. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 69

SECTION 178. NAVAJO CODE TALKERS MUSEUM CONSTRUCTION--
CLARIFY LOCATION--CHANGE AGENCY--GENERAL FUND.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the Indian affairs
department in Subsection 16 of Section 31 of Chapter 277 of
Laws 2019 and reauthorized in Laws 2023, Chapter 203, Section
132 and again in Laws 2025, Chapter 158, Section 214 to
acquire property and to plan, design, construct, furnish and
equip a Navajo code talkers museum for the Navajo Nation
shall not be expended for the original or reauthorized
purpose but is appropriated to the local government division
of the department of finance and administration to acquire
property and to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a
Navajo code talkers museum for the Navajo Nation in McKinley
county.
SECTION 179. NAVAJO CODE TALKERS MUSEUM CONSTRUCTION--
CLARIFY LOCATION--CHANGE AGENCY--GENERAL FUND.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the Indian affairs
department in Subsection 49 of Section 31 of Chapter 159 of
Laws 2025 to acquire property and to plan, design, construct,
furnish and equip a Navajo code talkers museum for the Navajo
Nation shall not be expended for the original purpose but is
appropriated to the local government division of the
department of finance and administration to acquire property
and to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a Navajo
code talkers museum for the Navajo Nation in McKinley county. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 70

SECTION 180. MCKINLEY COUNTY NORTHSIDE TRAIL
ACQUISITION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 290 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
acquire land for and to plan, design and construct the
northside trail system and outdoor mecca project in McKinley
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 181. NAVAJO ROUTE 30 AND UNITED STATES HIGHWAY
491 LIGHTING CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The
time of expenditure for the Indian affairs department project
originally appropriated in Subsection 13 of Section 70 of
Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 and reauthorized to the department of
transportation in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 109 to plan,
design, construct and equip lighting at the junction of
Navajo route 30 and United States highway 491 in the Mexican
Springs chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 182. NAVAJO NATION CROWNPOINT COMMUNITY
CEMETERY RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 6 of Section 47 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 for
geotechnical mapping and to plan, design, construct and
renovate the cemetery in the Crownpoint chapter of the Navajo
Nation in McKinley county is extended through fiscal year
2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 71

SECTION 183. NORTHWEST NEW MEXICO REGIONAL SOLID WASTE
AUTHORITY HEAVY MACHINERY REPLACEMENT--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL
FUND.--The time of expenditure for the department of
environment project in Subsection 49 of Section 20 of Chapter
66 of Laws 2024 to purchase, equip and replace commercial-
grade heavy machinery for the northwest New Mexico solid
waste authority in McKinley county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 184. OJO ENCINO CHAPTER WAREHOUSE
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 18 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct a heavy equipment and storage
warehouse in the Ojo Encino chapter of the Navajo Nation in
McKinley county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 185. RAMAH NAVAJO SCHOOL BOARD TRADING POST
RENOVATION--CHANGE AGENCY--GENERAL FUND.--The agency for the
Indian affairs department project originally authorized in
Subsection 18 of Section 25 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip a
trading post for the Ramah Navajo school board in McKinley
county is changed to the local government division of the
department of finance and administration.
SECTION 186. TOHATCHI CHAPTER WASTEWATER SYSTEM
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 72

expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 19 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, improve, replace, install and equip
septic tanks and leach fields for the Tohatchi chapter of the
Navajo Nation in McKinley county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 187. CHURCH ROCK CHAPTER SEWER LINE
IMPROVEMENTS--CHANGE TO CONSTRUCT A CHAPTER HOUSE--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the Indian affairs department in Subsection
31 of Section 25 of Chapter 199 of Laws 2023 to plan, design
and construct improvements to the eastside interceptor sewer
line in the Church Rock chapter of the Navajo Nation in
McKinley county shall not be expended for the original
purpose but is changed to plan, design, construct, furnish
and equip a chapter house building for the Church Rock
chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 188. CHURCH ROCK CHAPTER WAREHOUSE DESIGN--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the Indian affairs department project in Subsection 29 of
Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, equip and furnish a new warehouse in the Church
Rock chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county is
extended through fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 73

SECTION 189. CROWNPOINT CHAPTER SCHOOL BUS PURCHASE--
CHANGE TO CROWNPOINT CHAPTER HEAVY EQUIPMENT AND VEHICLE
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance
of the appropriation to the Indian affairs department in
Subsection 23 of Section 25 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase and equip accessible school buses for the head start
units in the Crownpoint chapter of the Navajo Nation in
McKinley county shall not be expended for the original
purpose but is changed to purchase and equip heavy equipment
and vehicles for the Crownpoint chapter of the Navajo Nation
in McKinley county. The time of expenditure is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 190. NAVAJO CODE TALKERS MUSEUM CONSTRUCTION--
CLARIFY LOCATION--CHANGE AGENCY--GENERAL FUND.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the Indian affairs
department in Subsection 1 of Section 25 of Chapter 66 of
Laws 2024 and reauthorized in Laws 2025, Chapter 158, Section
212 to acquire property and to plan, design, construct,
furnish and equip a Navajo code talkers museum for the Navajo
Nation shall not be expended for the original or reauthorized
purpose but is appropriated to the local government division
of the department of finance and administration to acquire
property and to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a
Navajo code talkers museum for the Navajo Nation in McKinley
county. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 74

SECTION 191. LAKE VALLEY CHAPTER VEHICLE AND EQUIPMENT
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project
originally authorized in Subsection 70 of Section 26 of
Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to purchase and equip road equipment,
including a grader and attachments, for the Lake Valley
chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan county and
reauthorized in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 119 is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 192. MANUELITO CHAPTER VETERANS BUILDING
UPGRADE--CHANGE TO MANUELITO CHAPTER VETERANS BUILDING
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the Indian affairs
department in Subsection 17 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of
Laws 2022 to plan, design, renovate, furnish, improve and
equip a modular building for veterans in the Manuelito
chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county shall not be
expended for the original purpose but is changed to plan,
design, construct, renovate, furnish, equip and improve a
building for veterans in the Manuelito chapter of the Navajo
Nation in McKinley county. The time of expenditure is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 193. MARIANO LAKE CHAPTER HOUSE WIRING
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 75

Subsection 5 of Section 47 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct chapter house wiring in the
Mariano Lake chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county
is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 194. PINEDALE CHAPTER MOTOR GRADER PURCHASE--
EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure for the
Indian affairs department project in Subsection 33 of Section
25 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and equip a motor
grader for the Pinedale chapter of the Navajo Nation in
McKinley county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 195. SMITH LAKE CHAPTER BATHROOM ADDITIONS AND
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 34 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct bathroom additions in the Smith
Lake chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 196. THOREAU CHAPTER VETERANS' SERVICE CENTER
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 36 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a veterans'
service center for the Thoreau chapter of the Navajo Nation
in McKinley county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 197. THOREAU CHAPTER HOUSE WIRING HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 76

CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO WAREHOUSE IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the Indian affairs department in Subsection
10 of Section 47 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design
and construct house wiring for the Thoreau chapter of the
Navajo Nation in McKinley county shall not be expended for
the original purpose but is changed to plan, design and
construct warehouse improvements for the Thoreau chapter of
the Navajo Nation in McKinley county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 198. TSAYATOH CHAPTER HOUSE
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 38 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a new chapter
house for the Tsayatoh chapter in the Navajo Nation in
McKinley county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 199. TSAYATOH CHAPTER RESIDENTIAL BATHROOM
ADDITIONS IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the Indian affairs department project
in Subsection 39 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct bathroom additions in the Tsayatoh
chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 200. CHURCH ROCK CHAPTER TRAIL IMPROVEMENT-- HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 77

CHANGE TO CHURCH ROCK CHAPTER HOUSE CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the Indian affairs department in Subsection
21 of Section 25 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to plan, design,
construct and improve a pedestrian trail and crossing,
including fencing, in the Church Rock chapter of the Navajo
Nation in McKinley county shall not be expended for the
original purpose but is changed to plan, design, construct,
furnish and equip a chapter house building for the Church
Rock chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county. The
time of expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 201. AGUA PURA MUTUAL DOMESTIC WATER CONSUMERS
AND MUTUAL SEWAGE WORKS ASSOCIATION BACKHOE PURCHASE--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of environment project in Subsection 55 of Section
22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to purchase and equip a backhoe
for the Agua Pura mutual domestic water consumers and mutual
sewage works association in Mora county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 202. MUSEUM HILL PROPERTY ACQUISITION--EXPAND
PURPOSE--GENERAL FUND.--The cultural affairs department
project in Subsection 15 of Section 21 of Chapter 159 of Laws
2025 to acquire land and property on Museum hill for the
cultural affairs department in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county
may include planning, design, construction, improvements, HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 78

repair or renovations and the purchase of equipment,
furniture or fixtures.
SECTION 203. OJO ENCINO CHAPTER WASTEWATER SYSTEM
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 45 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct a wastewater line extension to
connect to the Navajo tribal utility authority wastewater
system from the Ojo Encino chapter government complex in the
Ojo Encino chapter of the Navajo Nation in Sandoval and
McKinley counties is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 204. TAOS COUNTY DIXON TO PENASCO LOOP 1 GAS
PIPELINE CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the department of transportation
project in Subsection 91 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws
2022 to plan, design and construct loop 1 of a gas pipeline
from Dixon to Penasco on New Mexico highway 75 to New Mexico
highway 518 in Rio Arriba and Taos counties is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 205. UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO REPRODUCTIVE
HEALTH CLINIC CONSTRUCTION--EXPAND PURPOSE--GENERAL
FUND.--The university of New Mexico project in Subsection 26
of Section 46 of Chapter 159 of Laws 2025 to plan, design,
construct, equip and furnish a reproductive health care
clinic in northern New Mexico may include the acquisition of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 79

property.
SECTION 206. CRYSTAL CHAPTER LAND USE MASTER PLAN--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the Indian affairs department project originally
authorized in Subsection 14 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of
Laws 2022 for which the time of expenditure was previously
extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 115 to develop a
land use master plan for the Crystal chapter of the Navajo
Nation in McKinley and San Juan counties is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 207. OTERO COUNTY SHERIFF'S OFFICE VEHICLES
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 384
of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and
equip vehicles for the sheriff's office in Otero county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 208. ALAMOGORDO ALAMEDA PARK ZOO RESTROOMS
CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO SEWER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the local government division in Subsection
386 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to plan, design,
construct and equip restrooms at Alameda park zoo in
Alamogordo in Otero county shall not be expended for the
original purpose but is changed to plan, design, construct
and improve a sewer system, including manhole replacements HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 80

and sewer lines, at the Alameda park zoo in Alamogordo in
Otero county. The time of expenditure is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 209. ALAMOGORDO DUDLEY SCHOOL COMMUNITY CENTER
AND PARK EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The
time of expenditure for the local government division project
in Subsection 387 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase and install playground equipment at Dudley School
community center and park in Alamogordo in Otero county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 210. ALAMOGORDO POLICE VEHICLE PURCHASE--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure for the local
government division project in Subsection 390 of Section 28
of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and equip vehicles for
the police department in Alamogordo in Otero county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 211. ALAMOGORDO HIGH SCHOOL FIELD IMPROVEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the public education department project in Subsection 173
of Section 18 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and improve the soccer field, including demolishing
the field playing surface, regrading and installing
artificial turf, at the Riner Steinhoff soccer complex in the
Alamogordo public school district in Alamogordo in Otero
county is extended through fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 81

SECTION 212. TULAROSA WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of environment project in Subsection 67 of Section
22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct
water system improvements in Tularosa in Otero county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 213. MESALANDS COMMUNITY COLLEGE NURSING
PROGRAM FACILITY RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the higher education
department project in Subsection 9 of Section 37 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct and renovate a
nursing program facility, including an urgent care unit, at
Mesalands community college in Tucumcari in Quay county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 214. ACEQUIA DE LA PLAZA DE DIXON IMPROVEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the interstate stream commission project in Subsection 23
of Section 34 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the time
of expenditure was previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter
65, Section 146 to plan, design, construct and install
improvements for restoration of the acequia de La Plaza de
Dixon between New Mexico highways 75 and 68 in Rio Arriba
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 215. ACEQUIA DE LA PLAZA DE DIXON RENOVATION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 82

for the interstate stream commission project in Subsection 24
of Section 34 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the time
of expenditure was previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter
65, Section 147 to plan, design, construct and renovate
improvements to the acequia de La Plaza de Dixon south of the
Rio Embudo near New Mexico highway 75 in Rio Arriba county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 216. ACEQUIA DE LA PLAZA OF SERVILLETA PLAZA
REPAIR--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the interstate stream commission project in
Subsection 11 of Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, renovate and equip the acequia de la
Plaza of Servilleta Plaza in Rio Arriba county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 217. ACEQUIA DE LOS SALAZARES IMPROVEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the interstate stream commission project in Subsection 16
of Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and equip improvements for the acequia de los
Salazares in Rio Arriba county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 218. ACEQUIA DEL MEDIO IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
interstate stream commission project in Subsection 33 of
Section 34 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the time of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 83

expenditure was previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65,
Section 150 to plan, design and construct improvements,
including a sluice box, a headgate, pipeline and structures,
for the acequia del Medio in Rio Arriba county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 219. ACEQUIA DEL MOLINO IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
interstate stream commission project in Subsection 19 of
Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and improve the acequia del Molino in Rio Arriba
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 220. CEBOLLA MUTUAL DOMESTIC WATER CONSUMERS'
AND SEWAGE WORKS ASSOCIATION WATER SYSTEM REPAIR--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of environment project in Subsection 70 of Section
22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct
water system improvements, including the installation of fire
hydrants, for the Cebolla mutual domestic water consumers'
and sewage works association in Rio Arriba county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 221. LA ASOCIACION DE AGUA DE LOS BRAZOS WATER
SYSTEM IMPROVEMENTS--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the department of environment project
in Subsection 72 of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, demolish, construct and improve a water system, HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 84

including pump houses, water lines and water tanks, for la
asociacion de agua de Los Brazos in Rio Arriba county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 222. LOS APODACAS MUTUAL DOMESTIC WATER
CONSUMERS ASSOCIATION IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the department of
environment project in Subsection 73 of Section 22 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct, repair and
improve a well house, water tank and water lines for Los
Apodacas mutual domestic water consumers association in Rio
Arriba county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 223. NORTHERN NEW MEXICO STATE SCHOOL
INFRASTRUCTURE AND ROOFS IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE
TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the northern New
Mexico state school project in Subsection 1 of Section 42 of
Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct and repair
infrastructure improvements, including roof and structural
improvements, at the El Rito and Espanola campuses of
northern New Mexico state school in Rio Arriba county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 224. RIO ARRIBA COUNTY PUBLIC SAFETY VEHICLE
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 409
of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and
equip public safety vehicles for Rio Arriba county and the HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 85

Tierra Amarilla detention center in Rio Arriba county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 225. RIO EMBUDO MUTUAL DOMESTIC WATER CONSUMERS
ASSOCIATION WATER SYSTEM UPGRADE--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the department of
environment project in Subsection 74 of Section 22 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct, repair and
upgrade a drinking water system, including fences around a
water tank and repairs to a well house, for the Rio Embudo
mutual domestic water consumers association in Rio Arriba
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 226. TIERRA AMARILLA LAND GRANT HEAVY EQUIPMENT
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 412
of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and
equip heavy equipment, including a skid steer, dump trailer
and attachments, for the land grant-merced de los Pueblos de
Tierra Amarilla in Rio Arriba county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 227. VALLECITOS EAST DITCH ASSOCIATION
INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the interstate stream
commission project in Subsection 39 of Section 34 of Chapter
81 of Laws 2020 for which the time of expenditure was
previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 156 to HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 86

plan, design, repair and construct acequia improvements,
including a diversion dam, for the Vallecitos east ditch
association in Rio Arriba county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 228. VALLECITOS WEST DITCH ASSOCIATION
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the interstate stream commission project in
Subsection 40 of Section 34 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for
which the time of expenditure was previously extended in Laws
2024, Chapter 65, Section 156 to plan, design, construct,
repair and make improvements, including a diversion dam and a
headwall, for the Vallecitos west ditch association in Rio
Arriba county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 229. ACEQUIA DE LOS DURANES IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure for the
interstate stream commission project in Subsection 14 of
Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and improve the acequia de los Duranes in Rio
Arriba county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 230. ACEQUIA DEL RINCON CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
interstate stream commission project in Subsection 20 of
Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 for improvements to the
acequia and to plan, design and construct a regional drinking
water and wastewater system in the rural communities of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 87

Rinconada, Embudo, Dixon, Canoncito and Apodaca for the
acequia del Rincon in Rio Arriba county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 231. ACEQUIA DE LAS CANOVAS REPAIR--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
interstate stream commission project in Subsection 13 of
Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, improve and repair the acequia de las Canovas in
Rio Arriba county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 232. CANJILON MUTUAL DOMESTIC WATER CONSUMERS
AND MUTUAL SEWAGE WORKS ASSOCIATION WATER SYSTEM RENOVATION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the department of environment project in Subsection 76 of
Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, equip,
replace, renovate and construct water system improvements,
including storage tanks, cabling and level markers, for the
Canjilon mutual domestic water consumers and mutual sewage
works association in Canjilon in Rio Arriba county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 233. CHAMA WASTEWATER TREATMENT SYSTEM
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of environment project in
Subsection 77 of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct wastewater system improvements,
including a chemical treatment system, for Chama in Rio HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 88

Arriba county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 234. RIO ARRIBA COUNTY RECREATION AND ATHLETIC
CENTER CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the local government division project
in Subsection 324 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and equip a community recreation and
athletic facility in Espanola in Rio Arriba county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 235. ABIQUIU ELEMENTARY SCHOOL WELL HOUSE
REPLACEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the public education department project in
Subsection 183 of Section 18 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and repair the well
house, including the purchase and installation of a
sedimentation tank, for Abiquiu elementary school in the
Espanola public school district in Rio Arriba county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 236. ESPANOLA PUBLIC SCHOOL DISTRICT SECURITY
EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the public education department project in
Subsection 192 of Section 16 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase, equip and install security systems using artificial
intelligence and sensor technology in the Espanola public
school district in Rio Arriba county is extended through
fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 89

SECTION 237. ESPANOLA PUBLIC SCHOOL DISTRICT UTILITY
TRUCKS PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the public education department project in
Subsection 193 of Section 16 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase and equip maintenance and utility trucks for the
Espanola public school district in Rio Arriba county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 238. PUEBLO OF SANTA CLARA WATER SYSTEM
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 56 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct water system improvements for the
Pueblo of Santa Clara in Rio Arriba county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 239. ROOSEVELT COUNTY ROAD DEPARTMENT SPREADER
PURCHASE--CHANGE TO ROAD MAINTENANCE EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--
EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the local government division in Subsection
423 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and
equip a chip spreader for the road department in Roosevelt
county shall not be expended for the original purpose but is
changed to purchase equipment for the road maintenance
department in Roosevelt county. The time of expenditure is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 240. BLOOMFIELD IRRIGATION DISTRICT SPILLWAY HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 90

GATE--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the interstate stream commission project in
Subsection 44 of Section 34 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for
which the time of expenditure was previously extended in Laws
2024, Chapter 65, Section 166 to plan, design and construct a
spillgate and other improvements for the Citizens ditch and
La Pumpa acequia for the Bloomfield irrigation district in
San Juan county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 241. BECLABITO CHAPTER HELIPAD ACCESS ROAD
IMPROVEMENTS--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of transportation project in
Subsection 79 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct a helipad access road for the
Beclabito chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 242. HILLSIDE IRRIGATION DITCH JONES CANYON
SIPHON REPLACEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the interstate stream commission
project in Subsection 24 of Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws
2022 for which the time of expenditure was previously
extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 167 to replace the
Jones canyon siphon system on the Hillside irrigation ditch
in San Juan county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 243. NEWCOMB CHAPTER SOLAR STREET LIGHT
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 91

expenditure for the department of transportation project in
Subsection 77 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and install overhead solar street
lighting at the intersection of New Mexico highway 491 and
bureau of Indian affairs route 5001 in the Newcomb chapter of
the Navajo Nation in San Juan county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 244. TEEC NOS POS BATHROOM ADDITIONS
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 62 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct bathroom additions in the Teec Nos
Pos chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 245. TURLEY MANZANARES DITCH RIVER DIVERSION
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the interstate stream commission project in
Subsection 25 of Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct a permanent water supply diversion
for the Turley Manzanares ditch on the San Juan river in San
Juan county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 246. AZTEC WATER LINE RELOCATION--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of environment project originally authorized in
Subsection 81 of Section 26 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 92

which the time of expenditure was previously extended in Laws
2024, Chapter 65, Section 180 to acquire utility easements
and to plan, design and construct water lines along New
Mexico highway 173 in Aztec in San Juan county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 247. BECLABITO CHAPTER HELIPAD CONSTRUCTION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the Indian affairs department project in Subsection 63 of
Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and
construct a helipad in the Beclabito chapter of the Navajo
Nation in San Juan county is extended through fiscal year
2028.
SECTION 248. BLOOMFIELD WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT AND
WEST TANK REPLACEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the department of environment project
in Subsection 81 of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, replace, equip and install water
system improvements, including replacement of the west tank,
in Bloomfield in San Juan county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 249. WHITE ROCK CHAPTER CISTERN SYSTEMS
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 44 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct cistern systems in the White Rock HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 93

chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 250. SAN JUAN REGIONAL MEDICAL CENTER STEAM
PLANT EQUIPMENT INSTALL--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project in Subsection 346 of Section 30 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct, equip and install
steam plant improvements, including a deaerator tank and
pumps, a boiler, condensate storage tanks, condensate lift
stations, feed pumps and tube bundles, for the San Juan
regional medical center in Farmington in San Juan county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 251. GADII'AHI/TO'KOI CHAPTER PRESSURIZED
IRRIGATION SYSTEM CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the Indian affairs
department project in Subsection 57 of Section 26 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct and equip a
pressurized underground irrigation system for the
Gadii'ahi/To'koi chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 252. NAGEEZI CHAPTER DOMESTIC WATER LINE
DESIGN--CHANGE TO CEMETERY IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the Indian affairs department in Subsection
71 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 94

and construct a domestic water line in the Nageezi chapter of
the Navajo Nation in San Juan county shall not be expended
for the original purpose but is changed to plan, design and
construct community cemetery improvements in the Nageezi
chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 253. NASCHITTI CHAPTER POWER LINE
CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO MULTIPURPOSE BUILDING DESIGN--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the Indian affairs department in Subsection
67 of Section 70 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the
time of expenditure was previously extended in Laws 2024,
Chapter 65, Section 185 to plan, design and construct power
line extensions in the Naschitti chapter of the Navajo Nation
in San Juan county shall not be expended for the original
purpose but is changed to plan, design, construct, equip and
furnish a multipurpose building in the Naschitti chapter of
the Navajo Nation in San Juan county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 254. DINE COLLEGE SOUTH CAMPUS PARKING LOT
RENOVATIONS--CHANGE AGENCY--GENERAL FUND.--The Indian affairs
department project originally appropriated in Subsection 73
of Section 31 of Chapter 159 of Laws 2025 to plan, design,
construct, renovate and repair a parking lot at the south
campus of Dine college in Shiprock in San Juan county is HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 95

instead appropriated to the higher education department.
SECTION 255. GADII'AHI/TO'KOI CHAPTER HOUSING TRACT
PLAN--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 68 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct a housing complex in the
Gadii'ahi/To'Koi chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 256. SHIPROCK CHAPTER WATER AND WASTEWATER LINE
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of environment project
originally authorized in Subsection 88 of Section 26 of
Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 and appropriated to the Indian
affairs department in Laws 2021, Chapter 139, Section 63 and
for which the time of expenditure was previously extended in
Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 186 to plan, design and
construct water and wastewater lines on the south side of
Shiprock in the Shiprock chapter of the Navajo Nation in San
Juan county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 257. TWO GREY HILLS CHAPTER VETERANS MEMORIAL
PARK CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the Indian affairs department project
in Subsection 75 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct a veterans' memorial park in the
Toadlena/Two Grey Hills area of the Toadlena/Two Grey Hills HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 96

chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 258. WHITE ROCK CHAPTER BATHROOM CONSTRUCTION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the Indian affairs department project in Subsection 43 of
Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and equip bathroom additions in the White Rock
chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 259. EL CRESTON MUTUAL DOMESTIC WATER CONSUMERS
ASSOCIATION WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE
TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the department of
environment project in Subsection 84 of Section 22 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct water system
improvements, including meter cans, the installation of meter
can risers and the renovation of a water tank, for El Creston
mutual domestic water consumers association in San Miguel
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 260. SAN MIGUEL COUNTY EL PUEBLO COMMUNITY
CENTER IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE TO EL PUEBLO FIRE STATION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the local government division in Subsection
348 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, renovate and equip improvements to El Pueblo
community center, including bathrooms, windows and the HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 97

heating, ventilation and air conditioning system, in San
Miguel county shall not be expended for the original purpose
but is changed to plan, design, construct, improve, furnish
and equip El Pueblo fire station in San Miguel county. The
time of expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 261. LAS VEGAS EIGHTH STREET EXTENSION WATER
LINE CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO WATER METER INSTALLATION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the department of environment in Subsection
91 of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design
and construct a water line along Eighth street north of Mills
avenue in Las Vegas in San Miguel county shall not be
expended for the original purpose but is changed to purchase,
equip and install water meters in Las Vegas in San Miguel
county. The time of expenditure is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 262. NEW MEXICO BEHAVIORAL HEALTH INSTITUTE
FORENSICS BUILDING CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the capital program fund
project in Subsection 5 of Section 8 of Chapter 53 of Laws
2022 to plan, design, construct, equip and furnish a
forensics building at the New Mexico behavioral health
institute in Las Vegas in San Miguel county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 263. WEST LAS VEGAS PUBLIC SCHOOL DISTRICT BUS HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 98

PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure
for the public education department project in Subsection 201
of Section 16 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and
equip an activity bus for Rio Gallinas school for ecology and
the arts in the West Las Vegas public school district in San
Miguel county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 264. PECOS EMERGENCY VEHICLE AND EQUIPMENT
PURCHASE--CHANGE TO WATER AND WASTEWATER SYSTEMS
IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE AGENCY--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the local
government division in Subsection 452 of Section 28 of
Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and equip emergency
vehicles and equipment in Pecos in San Miguel county shall
not be expended for the original purpose but is appropriated
to the department of environment to acquire property and
easements for and to plan, design, construct, equip and
improve water and wastewater systems, including effluent
systems, in Pecos in San Miguel county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 265. PECOS WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE TO
PROPERTY ACQUISITION AND WATER, WASTEWATER AND EFFLUENT
SYSTEM CONSTRUCTION--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of
the appropriation to the department of environment in
Subsection 81 of Section 20 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
plan, design, construct, replace and install water lines and HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 99

water system improvements in Pecos in San Miguel county shall
not be expended for the original purpose but is changed to
acquire property and easements for and to plan, design,
construct and equip water, wastewater and effluent systems in
Pecos in San Miguel county.
SECTION 266. NACIMIENTO COMMUNITY DITCH ASSOCIATION
UPGRADES--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the interstate stream commission project in
Subsection 39 of Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and equip improvements for the
Nacimiento community ditch association in Sandoval county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 267. RANCHOS DE PLACITAS SANITATION DISTRICT
WELL 2A ARSENIC--EXPAND PURPOSE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL
FUND.--The department of environment project in Subsection 90
of Section 20 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to plan, design and
construct an arsenic treatment system for well 2A in the
Ranchos de Placitas sanitation district in Sandoval county
may include planning, designing and constructing a building
addition, including utilities. The time of expenditure is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 268. BERNALILLO ADMINISTRATION BUILDINGS SOLAR
PANEL INSTALLATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the local government division project
in Subsection 367 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 100

plan, design, construct, purchase and equip administrative
buildings with solar panels in Bernalillo in Sandoval county
is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 269. BERNALILLO NEW MEXICO HIGHWAY 165 AND
FRONTAGE ROAD IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE TO ROADS AND SIDEWALKS
IMPROVEMENT--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the department of transportation in
Subsection 85 of Section 33 of Chapter 199 of Laws 2023 to
acquire rights of way and to plan, design and construct
improvements to New Mexico highway 165 and Frontage road in
Bernalillo in Sandoval county shall not be expended for the
original purpose but is changed to acquire rights of way and
to plan, design, construct and improve roads, including
drainage and sidewalks, in Bernalillo in Sandoval county.
SECTION 270. BERNALILLO WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the department of environment project in Subsection 102
of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire easements
and rights of way for and to plan, design, construct,
purchase, equip and install water system improvements,
including water lines and fire hydrants, on calle Don
Francisco, calle del Presidente, avenida Perea and calle
Evangeline in Bernalillo in Sandoval county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 271. BERNALILLO WASTEWATER TREATMENT PLANT HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 101

IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of environment project in
Subsection 93 of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, replace, purchase and equip
wastewater system improvements, including ultraviolet
disinfection equipment, water pump stations, mechanical
screens, aerated grit removal, fall protection and post-
aeration systems, at the wastewater treatment plant for
Bernalillo in Sandoval county is extended through fiscal year
2028.
SECTION 272. COCHITI LAKE CITY HALL COMMUNITY SPACE
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 370 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and equip a multi-use town hall lawn
area, including a bandstand, a children's hub, community
picnic areas, sidewalk connections, electrical systems, a
concrete foundation and roofing, in Cochiti Lake in Sandoval
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 273. COCHITI LAKE SOLAR POWER SYSTEM
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 371 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct a solar power system, including
administrative offices, a library and a fire station, in HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 102

Cochiti Lake in Sandoval county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 274. PUEBLO OF COCHITI CHILDREN'S LEARNING
CENTER CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the Indian affairs department project
in Subsection 83 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, renovate and equip a children's
learning center, including an additional facility, in the
Pueblo of Cochiti in Sandoval county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 275. PUEBLO OF COCHITI SENIOR CENTER
RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the aging and long-term services department
project in Subsection 12 of Section 5 of Chapter 53 of Laws
2022 to plan, design, construct, renovate and equip a senior
center in the Pueblo of Cochiti in Sandoval county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 276. CORRALES WASTEWATER BYPASS AND COLLECTION
SYSTEM--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of environment project in
Subsection 108 of Section 26 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for
which the time of expenditure was previously extended in Laws
2024, Chapter 65, Section 194 to plan, design and construct a
wastewater emergency bypass and collection system for
Corrales in Sandoval county is extended through fiscal year HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 103

2028.
SECTION 277. JEMEZ SPRINGS COMMUNITY PARK
ADMINISTRATION BUILDING CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO WELCOME
CENTER CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the local
government division in Subsection 412 of Section 28 of
Chapter 199 of Laws 2023 to plan, design, construct, furnish
and equip an administration building at Jemez Springs
community park in Jemez Springs in Sandoval county shall not
be expended for the original purpose but is changed to plan,
design, construct, furnish and equip a welcome center at
Jemez Springs community park in Jemez Springs in Sandoval
county. The time of expenditure is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 278. IDALIA ROAD NE AND LOMA COLORADO BOULEVARD
INTERSECTION IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the department of
transportation project in Subsection 81 of Section 36 of
Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct and
improve the intersection at Idalia road NE and Loma Colorado
boulevard in Rio Rancho in Sandoval county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 279. ZENITH COURT NE ACCESS TO RIO RANCHO
PUBLIC SCHOOL DISTRICT CONSTRUCTION--EXPAND PURPOSE--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The department of transportation project HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 104

in Subsection 87 of Section 33 of Chapter 199 of Laws 2023 to
plan, design and construct an access point for traffic
entering and exiting Rio Rancho public school district
facilities at Zenith court NE and New Mexico state road 528
in Sandoval county may include additional improvements for
traffic access to the district facilities. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 280. PUEBLO OF SAN FELIPE RECREATION FACILITIES
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 77 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
construct little league baseball fields and recreational
facilities in the Black Mesa View subdivision for the Pueblo
of San Felipe in Sandoval county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 281. SAN FELIPE PUEBLO VETERANS FACILITY PLAN--
CHANGE TO VETERANS CENTER CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL
FUND.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to the
Indian affairs department in Subsection 90 of Section 31 of
Chapter 159 of Laws 2025 to plan and design a veterans center
in the Pueblo of San Felipe in Sandoval county shall not be
expended for the original purpose but is changed to plan,
design, construct, furnish and equip a veterans center in the
Pueblo of San Felipe in Sandoval county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 105

SECTION 282. SAN YSIDRO WATER STORAGE TANK RENOVATION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the department of environment project in Subsection 106
of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and
construct water system improvements, including refurbishing a
water storage tank, in San Ysidro in Sandoval county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 283. TORREON/STAR LAKE CHAPTER EMERGENCY
MEDICAL SERVICES BUILDING CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO LIBRARY AND
FAMILY LEARNING CENTER CONSTRUCTION--GENERAL FUND.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the Indian affairs
department in Subsection 138 of Section 25 of Chapter 199 of
Laws 2023 to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip an
emergency medical services building in the Torreon/Star Lake
chapter of the Navajo Nation in Sandoval county shall not be
expended for the original purpose but is changed to plan,
design, construct, furnish and equip a library and family
learning center in the Torreon/Star Lake chapter of the
Navajo Nation in Sandoval county.
SECTION 284. ACEQUIA DE LA OTRA BANDA IMPROVEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the interstate stream commission project originally
authorized in Subsection 56 of Section 34 of Chapter 81 of
Laws 2020 to plan, design and construct improvements,
including a diversion, to the acequia de la Otra Banda in HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 106

Santa Fe county and reauthorized in Laws 2024, Chapter 65,
Section 199 is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 285. ACEQUIA DEL CANO IMPROVEMENTS--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
interstate stream commission project in Subsection 48 of
Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and
construct improvements to the acequia del Cano in Santa Fe
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 286. ACEQUIA DEL CANO IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
interstate stream commission project in Subsection 59 of
Section 34 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the time of
expenditure was previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65,
Section 200 to plan, design and construct improvements to the
acequia del Cano in Santa Fe county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 287. ACEQUIA DEL RANCHO IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
interstate stream commission project in Subsection 47 of
Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and install improvements to the acequia del Rancho
in Santa Fe county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 288. CANADA DE LOS ALAMOS MUTUAL DOMESTIC WATER
CONSUMERS' AND MUTUAL SEWAGE WORKS ASSOCIATION WATER SYSTEM
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 107

expenditure for the department of environment project in
Subsection 115 of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and improve a water system for the
Canada de Los Alamos mutual domestic water consumers' and
mutual sewage works association in Santa Fe county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 289. LA BAJADA COMMUNITY DITCH AND MUTUAL
DOMESTIC WATER ASSOCIATION FENCE CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of environment project in Subsection 108 of
Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and
construct a fence around the water tank and pump house for La
Bajada community ditch and mutual domestic water association
in Santa Fe county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 290. LA BAJADA COMMUNITY DITCH AND MUTUAL
DOMESTIC WATER ASSOCIATION WELL HOUSE CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of environment project in Subsection 109 of
Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, equip and install a well house for La Bajada
community ditch and mutual domestic water association in
Santa Fe county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 291. SANTA FE COUNTY RECOVERY CENTER PURCHASE--
CHANGE TO YOUTH BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES FACILITY--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 108

appropriation to the local government division originally
authorized in Subsection 385 of Section 35 of Chapter 81 of
Laws 2020 and reauthorized in Laws 2022, Chapter 52, Section
123 and again in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 215 to plan,
design and construct an expansion to a facility for a
recovery program in Santa Fe county shall not be expended for
the original or reauthorized purpose but is changed to
purchase land and buildings and to plan, design, construct,
renovate, furnish and equip a facility for youth behavioral
health services in Santa Fe county. The time of expenditure
is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 292. SANTA FE COUNTY CHUPADERO WATER AND SEWAGE
CORPORATION WATER AND WASTEWATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of environment project in Subsection 112 of
Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and improve water and wastewater systems for the
Chupadero water and sewage corporation in Santa Fe county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 293. SANTA FE COUNTY COMMUNITY PARK SHADE
STRUCTURE CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project in Subsection 393 of Section 30 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct, purchase and
equip shade structures for a community center park in the HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 109

Galisteo area in Santa Fe county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 294. SANTA FE COUNTY ELDORADO SUBDIVISION ROADS
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of transportation project in
Subsection 85 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and improve roads in the Eldorado
subdivision in Santa Fe county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 295. SANTA FE COUNTY ELECTRONIC ROAD SIGNS
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 482
of Section 53 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and
equip electronic voting location signs for Santa Fe county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 296. SANTA FE COUNTY RECOVERY CENTER--CHANGE TO
RECOVERY AND REENTRY PROGRAM FACILITIES PURCHASE--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the local government division originally
authorized in Subsection 386 of Section 34 of Chapter 277 of
Laws 2019 and reauthorized in Laws 2022, Chapter 52, Section
116 and again in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 216 to
purchase land and buildings and to plan, design, construct,
renovate, furnish and equip a facility for a recovery program
in Santa Fe county shall not be expended for the original or HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 110

reauthorized purpose but is changed to purchase land and
buildings and to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish
and equip facilities for recovery and reentry programs in
Santa Fe county. The time of expenditure is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 297. SANTA FE COUNTY AGUA FRIA SEWER
EXPANSION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of environment project in
Subsection 113 of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, improve and expand the sewer system
at Agua Fria village in Santa Fe county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 298. SANTA FE COUNTY SHERIFF PROTECTIVE GEAR
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 489
of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase, equip
and replace protective gear, safety gear and stun guns for
the sheriff's office in Santa Fe county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 299. SANTA FE COUNTY RECOVERY CENTER PURCHASE--
CHANGE TO TRANSITIONAL HOUSING FACILITY--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL
FUND.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to the
local government division in Subsection 444 of Section 28 of
Chapter 199 of Laws 2023 to purchase land and buildings and
to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip a HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 111

Santa Fe recovery center facility in Santa Fe in Santa Fe
county shall not be expended for the original purpose but is
changed to acquire land and buildings and to plan, design,
construct, renovate, furnish and equip a transitional housing
facility serving individuals released from incarceration in
Santa Fe county. The time of expenditure is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 300. SANTA FE COUNTY RECOVERY CENTER PURCHASE--
CHANGE TO TRANSITIONAL HOUSING FACILITY--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the local government division in Subsection
403 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to purchase land
and buildings and to plan, design, construct, renovate,
furnish and equip a Santa Fe recovery center facility in
Santa Fe in Santa Fe county shall not be expended for the
original purpose but is changed to acquire land and buildings
and to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip a
transitional housing facility serving individuals released
from incarceration in Santa Fe county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 301. SANTA FE COUNTY RECOVERY CENTER PURCHASE--
CHANGE TO TRANSITIONAL HOUSING FACILITY--GENERAL FUND.--The
unexpended balance of the appropriation to the local
government division in Subsection 498 of Section 28 of
Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase land and buildings and to HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 112

plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip a Santa
Fe recovery center facility in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county
shall not be expended for the original purpose but is changed
to acquire land and buildings for and to plan, design,
construct, renovate, furnish and equip a transitional housing
facility serving individuals released from incarceration in
Santa Fe county.
SECTION 302. PUEBLO OF TESUQUE CULTURAL PRESERVATION
BUILDING PLAN--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 103 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct a cultural preservation building
in the Pueblo of Tesuque in Santa Fe county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 303. PUEBLO OF TESUQUE MULTIPURPOSE FACILITY
PLAN--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 104 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct a multipurpose facility in the
Pueblo of Tesuque in Santa Fe county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 304. PUEBLO OF TESUQUE SOLAR POWER SYSTEM
DESIGN--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 105 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 113

plan, design, construct, purchase and install a solar power
system at the intergenerational center and administration
building at the Pueblo of Tesuque in Santa Fe county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 305. ACEQUIA DEL LLANO IMPROVEMENTS--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
interstate stream commission project in Subsection 45 of
Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and
construct improvements to the acequia del Llano, including
headgates, metal plates and screens for the consolidated
ditch dividers and chain link fencing at the consolidated
ditch sand trap, in Santa Fe county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 306. EDGEWOOD TRAIL SYSTEM DEVELOPMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
local government division project in Subsection 388 of
Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire easements
and rights of way for and to plan, design and construct a
trail system for Edgewood in Santa Fe county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 307. NAMBE PUEBLO ADMINISTRATIVE BUILDING
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 93 of Section 26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and equip a new administrative HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 114

building in the Pueblo of Nambe in Santa Fe county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 308. JOHN F. SIMMS JR. BUILDING RENOVATION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the capital program fund project in Subsection 8 of
Section 8 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, renovate, improve, equip and furnish the John F.
Simms Jr. building for the department of information
technology in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 309. EXECUTIVE OFFICE BUILDING CONSTRUCTION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the capital program fund project in Subsection 10 of
Section 8 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, furnish and equip, including demolition of
existing structures, an executive office building on the main
capitol complex in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 310. GOVERNOR MILES ROAD CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of transportation project in Subsection 87 of
Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire easements
and rights of way and to plan, design, construct and repair
Governor Miles road from Richards avenue to Nizhoni drive in
Santa Fe in Santa Fe county is extended through fiscal year HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 115

2028.
SECTION 311. HARRISON ROAD IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local
government division project in Subsection 400 of Section 30
of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire rights of way and to
plan, design and construct improvements, including lighting
and sidewalks, along Harrison road from Cerrillos road to
Agua Fria street in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 312. MONTE DEL SOL CHARTER SCHOOL VEHICLE
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure
for the public education department project in Subsection 217
of Section 16 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and
equip vehicles for Monte del Sol charter school in Santa Fe
in Santa Fe county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 313. SANTA FE PACHECO STREET IMPROVEMENTS--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the department of transportation project in Subsection 88
of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire easements
and rights of way and to plan, design, construct and improve
Pacheco street, including pedestrian and bicycle
improvements, between west San Mateo road and Alta Vista
street in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 314. ELDORADO AVENIDA VISTA GRANDE CROSSWALK HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 116

LIGHT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of transportation project in
Subsection 84 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, purchase and install a pedestrian
crosswalk lighting system at a crosswalk on avenida Vista
Grande west of avenida Torreon in Eldorado in Santa Fe county
is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 315. SANTA FE CENTER FOR CONTEMPORARY ARTS
RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the cultural affairs department project in
Subsection 13 of Section 9 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, equip, furnish and renovate the
center for contemporary arts, including safety and security
updates and accessibility compliance, in Santa Fe in Santa Fe
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 316. SANTA FE COUNTY MAGISTRATE COURT
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the administrative office of the courts
project in Subsection 2 of Section 4 of Chapter 53 of Laws
2022 to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip
a magistrate court in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 317. SANTA FE MEDIAN BEAUTIFICATION PHASE 1
DESIGN--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of transportation project in HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 117

Subsection 83 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, landscape and make phase 1
improvements to medians on arterials and collector roads for
Santa Fe in Santa Fe county is extended through fiscal year
2028.
SECTION 318. SANTA FE SUPPORTIVE HOUSING RENOVATION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 401
of Section 35 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the time
of expenditure was previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter
65, Section 220 to plan, design, construct and renovate a
facility for homeless and below-market renters, including
housing and services, in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 319. STATE LAND OFFICE LIGHTING AND CEILING
REPLACEMENT--STATE LANDS MAINTENANCE FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the state land office project originally
authorized in Section 86 of Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 and
reauthorized in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 221 to plan,
design, construct and renovate the bathroom facilities at the
state land office in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 320. TIERRA CONTENTA TRAIL IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
local government division project in Subsection 407 of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 118

Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire easements
and rights of way and to plan, design and construct the
Tierra Contenta trail from Buffalo Grass road to south
Meadows road in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 321. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH NEW MEXICO VETERANS'
HOME NEW FACILITY CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO NEW MEXICO
VETERANS' HOME FACILITY IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE
TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to
the capital program fund in Subsection 11 of Section 8 of
Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct, furnish
and equip a new veterans' home on the New Mexico veterans'
home campus in Truth or Consequences in Sierra county shall
not be expended for the original purpose but is changed to
plan, design, construct, repair, furnish, equip and improve
the New Mexico veterans' home campus in Truth or Consequences
in Sierra county. The time of expenditure is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 322. ELEPHANT BUTTE OFF-HIGHWAY VEHICLE
RECREATION PARK CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO TRUTH OR CONSEQUENCES
OFF-HIGHWAY VEHICLE RECREATION PARK CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the local government division in Subsection
411 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design
and construct an off-highway vehicle recreation park for HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 119

Elephant Butte in Sierra county shall not be expended for the
original purpose but is changed to plan, design and construct
an off-highway vehicle recreation park in Truth or
Consequences in Sierra county. The time of expenditure is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 323. WILLIAMSBURG PARK AND RECREATION
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 413 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, purchase, furnish and equip
improvements to parks, including fencing, outdoor furniture,
shade structures, landscaping and parking lots, in
Williamsburg in Sierra county is extended through fiscal year
2028.
SECTION 324. ALAMO CHAPTER SATELLITE INTERNET
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the Indian affairs
department project in Subsection 106 of Section 26 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 for which the time of expenditure was
previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 227 to
plan, design, purchase and install information technology for
the Alamo chapter of the Navajo Nation in Socorro county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 325. SOCORRO HIGH SCHOOL DRAINAGE
CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO GYMNASIUM RENOVATION--EXTEND HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 120

TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the public education department in
Subsection 224 of Section 16 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
plan, design and construct drainage system improvements for
the campus field and track at Socorro high school in the
Socorro consolidated school district in Socorro county shall
not be expended for the original purpose but is changed to
plan, design, construct, renovate and repair the Seery
gymnasium at Socorro high school in the Socorro consolidated
school district in Socorro county. The time of expenditure
is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 326. ALAMO CHAPTER SCATTERED POWER AND WATER
LINE EXTENSION--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the Indian affairs department project in
Subsection 33 of Section 47 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
acquire easements and rights of way for and to plan, design
and construct power and water lines in the Alamo chapter of
the Navajo Nation in Socorro county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 327. SOCORRO INDUSTRIAL PARK MULTIPURPOSE
BUILDING CONSTRUCTION--CHANGE TO PURCHASE AND RENOVATE A
COMMERCIAL BUILDING--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended balance of
the appropriation to the local government division in
Subsection 515 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 and
reauthorized in Laws 2025, Chapter 158, Section 388 to plan, HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 121

design, construct, purchase and equip a multipurpose building
in an industrial park in Socorro in Socorro county shall not
be used for the original or reauthorized purpose but is
changed to purchase a building and to plan, design,
construct, renovate, furnish and equip a building, including
infrastructure and utilities, in Socorro in Socorro county.
SECTION 328. CENTRAL NEW MEXICO COMMUNITY COLLEGE
ELEMENTARY AND MIDDLE SCHOOL SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING
AND MATHEMATICS LABORATORY EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--CHANGE
AGENCY--GENERAL FUND.--The agency for the public education
department project in Subsection 236 of Section 25 of Chapter
159 of Laws 2025 to purchase and equip science, technology,
engineering and mathematics laboratory equipment for an
elementary and middle school program statewide is changed to
the higher education department.
SECTION 329. MAIN STREET AND ARTS AND CULTURAL DISTRICT
INFRASTRUCTURE STATEWIDE--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the economic development
department project in Subsection 1 of Section 17 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct and improve
infrastructure in downtown main street districts and in local
arts and cultural districts statewide is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 330. PUBLIC SCHOOL BUS CAMERAS PURCHASE
STATEWIDE--EXTEND TIME--PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL OUTLAY HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 122

FUND.--The time of expenditure for the public education
department project in Subsection 2 of Section 47 of Chapter
66 of Laws 2024 to purchase cameras for newly purchased to-
and-from school buses statewide is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 331. SCHOOL BUS REPLACEMENT STATEWIDE--EXTEND
TIME--PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL OUTLAY FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the public education department project in
Subsection 3 of Section 47 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase district-owned to-and-from school buses is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 332. RIVER RESTORATION AND ENDANGERED SPECIES
PROTECTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the office of the state engineer project in
Subsection 6 of Section 21 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct habitat restoration projects in
the Rio Grande, San Juan and Pecos river basins statewide is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 333. YOUTH BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SOUTH CAMPUS
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of finance and administration
project in Subsection 3 of Section 24 of Chapter 53 of Laws
2022 to acquire property and to plan, design, construct,
equip and furnish a youth behavioral health campus in
southern New Mexico is extended through fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 123

SECTION 334. EXPO NEW MEXICO FAIRGROUNDS INFRASTRUCTURE
IMPROVEMENT AND SITE ACQUISITION--CLARIFY PROJECT--GENERAL
FUND.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to the
state fair commission in Laws 2025, Chapter 159, Section 29
to plan, design, construct, renovate, repair, furnish and
equip facilities at the New Mexico state fair fairgrounds in
Bernalillo county and to acquire property for a future state
fair site shall not be expended for the original purpose but
is changed to plan, design, construct, renovate, repair,
furnish and equip facilities at the New Mexico state fair
grounds in Bernalillo county and to acquire property that
advances the expansion of the current or proposed state fair
site statewide.
SECTION 335. ACEQUIA DE ABAJO LA LOMA REPLACEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the interstate stream commission project in Subsection 51
of Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and
construct improvements, including replacements of subsurface
pipeline, headgate and facilities, for acequia de Abajo la
Loma in Taos county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 336. ACEQUIA DE SAN MIGUEL IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
interstate stream commission project in Subsection 53 of
Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and
construct improvements to the acequia de San Miguel in Taos HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 124

county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 337. ACEQUIA MADRE DE RIO COSTILLA
IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the interstate stream commission project in
Subsection 55 of Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct improvements to the water systems
of acequia Madre de Rio Costilla in Taos county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 338. LA MERCED DE SANTA BARBARA LAND GRANT
ACQUISITION OF A COMMUNITY CENTER--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project in Subsection 425 of Section 30 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to acquire land and to plan, design,
construct, renovate, furnish and equip a community center for
La Merced de Santa Barbara in Taos county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 339. SANTO TOMAS APOSTOL DEL RIO DE LAS TRAMPAS
LAND GRANT-MERCED PLAZA PARKING LOT IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure for the local
government division project originally authorized in
Subsection 475 of Section 28 of Chapter 199 of Laws 2023 and
reauthorized in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 247 to plan,
design, construct and improve the plaza parking lot of the
Santo Tomas Apostol del Rio de las Trampas land grant-merced
in Taos county is extended through fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 125

SECTION 340. TAOS COUNTY NEW MEXICO HIGHWAY 518 LOOP 2
GAS PIPELINE CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the department of
transportation project in Subsection 92 of Section 36 of
Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct loop 2
of a gas pipeline on New Mexico highway 518 in Taos county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 341. LOWER ARROYO HONDO MUTUAL DOMESTIC WATER
CONSUMERS AND MUTUAL SEWER WORKS ASSOCIATION IMPROVEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the department of environment project in Subsection 129
of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and equip water system improvements, including the
installation of water lines and service connections, a water
storage tank and an automatic meter reading system, for the
lower Arroyo Hondo mutual domestic water consumers and mutual
sewer works association in Taos county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 342. EL PRADO WATER AND SANITATION DISTRICT
WELL SITE NUMBER 2 IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the department of
environment project in Subsection 124 of Section 22 of
Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to design, construct, improve and
equip public water supply well site number 2, including a
housing unit, security fencing, an emergency generator, HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 126

improvements to an observation well and replacement of a
pump, an electrical system and a roof, for El Prado water and
sanitation district in Taos county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 343. MESA VISTA CONSOLIDATED SCHOOL DISTRICT
ACTIVITY BUS PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time
of expenditure for the public education department project in
Subsection 196 of Section 16 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase and equip an activity bus for the Mesa Vista
consolidated school district in Rio Arriba county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 344. MESA VISTA HIGH SCHOOL TRACK
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the public education department project in
Subsection 212 of Section 18 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and equip improvements to a track,
including turf and drainage, at Mesa Vista high school in the
Mesa Vista consolidated school district in Taos county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 345. QUESTA BUSINESS PARK IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
local government division project in Subsection 428 of
Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and
construct improvements, including pavement, fencing and
equipment, for a business park in Questa in Taos county is HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 127

extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 346. QUESTA ROADS DESIGN--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
department of transportation project in Subsection 93 of
Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and improve roads in Questa in Taos county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 347. QUESTA VETERANS MEMORIAL FIELD EQUIPMENT
PURCHASE--CHANGE TO EQUIPMENT, FURNISHINGS AND STORAGE
BUILDING PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The unexpended
balance of the appropriation to the local government division
in Subsection 533 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase equipment for a veterans memorial field in Questa in
Taos county shall not be expended for the original purpose
but is changed to purchase equipment and furnishings and to
plan, design, purchase, construct, equip and furnish a
storage building for a veterans memorial field in Questa in
Taos county. The time of expenditure is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 348. RED RIVER VALLEY CHARTER SCHOOL FACILITY
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the public education department project in
Subsection 213 of Section 18 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and equip a facility for the Red
River Valley charter school in Taos county is extended HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 128

through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 349. RED RIVER PUBLIC WORKS BUILDING
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of environment project in
Subsection 135 of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, equip and furnish a public works
building for Red River in Taos county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 350. TALPA COMMUNITY CENTER RENOVATION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
local government division project in Subsection 421 of
Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, renovate, furnish and equip the Talpa community
center, including the heating, ventilation and air
conditioning system, windows, wood floors and fencing, in
Taos county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 351. TAOS COUNTY AFFORDABLE HOUSING PROJECT
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 430 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct an affordable housing project in
Taos in Taos county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 352. TAOS MUNICIPAL SCHOOL DISTRICT BUILDINGS
AND GROUNDS EQUIPMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the public education department HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 129

project in Subsection 215 of Section 18 of Chapter 53 of Laws
2022 to plan, design, construct, purchase and install a
security system district-wide, including automatic door locks
and video and audio alerts, for the Taos municipal school
district in Taos county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 353. PUEBLO OF TAOS SENIOR DAY CARE
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the aging and long-term services department
project in Subsection 19 of Section 5 of Chapter 53 of Laws
2022 to acquire easements and rights of way and to plan,
design, construct, furnish and equip a senior day care
facility for the Pueblo of Taos in Taos county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 354. TAOS SKI VALLEY FIRE HYDRANT
INSTALLATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of environment project in
Subsection 136 of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
purchase, equip and install fire hydrants in Taos Ski Valley
in Taos county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 355. TAJIQUE LAND GRANT-MERCED COMMUNITY CENTER
RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 435 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, renovate, equip and furnish a
community multipurpose center and park for the Town of HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 130

Tajique land grant-merced in Torrance county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 356. DURAN WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENTS--CHANGE TO
TORRANCE COUNTY WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENTS--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the department of environment in Subsection
137 of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and equip water system improvements for Duran in
Torrance county shall not be expended for the original
purpose but is changed to plan, design, construct and equip
water system improvements in Torrance county. The time of
expenditure is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 357. TORREON ACEQUIA ASSOCIATION REPAIR--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
interstate stream commission project in Subsection 57 of
Section 29 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and equip acequia repairs and improvements for the
Torreon acequia association in Torrance county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 358. TORREON LAND GRANT COMMUNITY CENTER AND
FIRE DEPARTMENT RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the local government
division project in Subsection 440 of Section 30 of Chapter
53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design, construct, improve, furnish
and equip a community center and fire department for the HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 131

Torreon land grant in Torrance county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 359. TORRANCE COUNTY FAIRGROUNDS CONSTRUCTION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 437
of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, furnish and equip improvements to the county
fairgrounds in Estancia in Torrance county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 360. MORIARTY ANIMAL SHELTER REPLACEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 442
of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and equip an animal shelter in Moriarty in Torrance
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 361. MORIARTY CITY HALL BUILDING REPLACEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 443
of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct, furnish and equip a city hall facility for
Moriarty in Torrance county is extended through fiscal year
2028.
SECTION 362. MOUNTAINAIR PUBLIC LIBRARY IMPROVEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 445 HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 132

of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design,
construct and renovate the public library in Mountainair in
Torrance county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 363. MOUNTAINAIR WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENT--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure
for the department of environment project in Subsection 138
of Section 22 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and
construct water system improvements, including an additional
well and renovations to Willard well 1 and Willard well 2b,
for Mountainair in Torrance county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 364. DES MOINES AMBULANCE PURCHASE--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure for the local
government division project in Subsection 555 of Section 28
of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and equip ambulances
for Des Moines in Union county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 365. FOLSOM HEAVY EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure for the local
government division project in Subsection 557 of Section 28
of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and install equipment
for the public works department in Folsom in Union county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 366. BELEN ARAGON DETENTION POND CONSTRUCTION--
EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 133

for the department of transportation project in Subsection 94
of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and
construct Aragon pond and minor drainage appurtenances
southwest of the intersection of west Aragon road and the
west frontage road west of Belen in Valencia county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 367. VALENCIA COUNTY ADMINISTRATION BUILDING
RENOVATION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 451 of Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct, improve and equip an administration
building, including accessibility compliance features, fire
alarms, sprinklers, electricity, plumbing and heating,
ventilation and air conditioning, in Valencia county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 368. VALENCIA COUNTY SHERIFF'S OFFICE TRAINING
EQUIPMENT PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of
expenditure for the local government division project in
Subsection 564 of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to
purchase and equip gear and supplies for training in the
sheriff's office in Valencia county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 369. VALENCIA SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION
DISTRICT RIO ABAJO CONSERVATION AREA IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 134

New Mexico state university project in Subsection 26 of
Section 41 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to demolish existing
buildings and to remediate and upgrade the Rio Abajo
conservation area for the Valencia soil and water
conservation district in Valencia county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 370. BELEN DRAINAGE IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the office
of the state engineer project in Subsection 9 of Section 21
of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to update a master plan and to
plan, design, construct and improve drainage structures and
systems in the Belen area in Valencia county is extended
through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 371. UNITED STATES INTERSTATE HIGHWAY 25 NORTH
EXIT 195 DESIGN--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time
of expenditure for the department of transportation project
in Subsection 101 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct a westward connector at the north
interchange at interstate 25 exit 195 in Belen in Valencia
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 372. BOSQUE FARMS DIGITAL RADIO EQUIPMENT--
EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure for the
local government division project in Subsection 568 of
Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and equip
digital radios for the police department, the fire department HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 135

and emergency medical services in Bosque Farms in Valencia
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 373. BOSQUE FARMS POLICE VEHICLE PURCHASE--
EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure for the
local government division project in Subsection 569 of
Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and equip
police vehicles in Bosque Farms in Valencia county is
extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 374. LOS LUNAS POLICE VEHICLE PURCHASE--EXTEND
TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure for the local
government division project in Subsection 571 of Section 28
of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase and equip vehicles for
the Los Lunas police department in Los Lunas in Valencia
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 375. PERALTA AMOR COURT IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE TO
PERALTA ROADS AND FLOOD CONTROL IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The unexpended balance of the
appropriation to the department of transportation in
Subsection 102 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design, construct and improve Amor court in Peralta in
Valencia county shall not be expended for the original
purpose but is changed to plan, design, construct and improve
various roads and flood control in Peralta in Valencia
county. The time of expenditure is extended through fiscal
year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 136

SECTION 376. RIO COMMUNITIES PARK ACQUISITION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
local government division project in Subsection 461 of
Section 30 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to acquire land and to
plan, design and construct projects identified in the Rio
Communities parks and open spaces assessment plan for Rio
Communities in Valencia county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 377. RIO COMMUNITIES PUBLIC WORKS EQUIPMENT
PURCHASE--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL FUND.--The time of expenditure
for the local government division project in Subsection 559
of Section 28 of Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to purchase
equipment and heavy equipment for the public works department
in Rio Communities in Valencia county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 378. TOWN OF TOME LAND GRANT-MERCED
MULTIPURPOSE COMMUNITY CENTER IMPROVEMENT--CHANGE TO ACQUIRE
PROPERTY AND IMPROVE FACILITIES--EXTEND TIME--GENERAL
FUND.--The unexpended balance of the appropriation to the
local government division in Subsection 579 of Section 28 of
Chapter 66 of Laws 2024 to plan, design, construct, renovate,
repair and improve the Tome Dominguez community center and
baseball field, including the purchase and installation of
solar panels and heating, ventilation and air conditioning
systems, for the Town of Tome land grant-merced in Tome in HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 137

Valencia county shall not be expended for the original
purpose but is changed to acquire land and buildings and to
plan, design, construct, repair, furnish, equip and improve
facilities for the Town of Tome land grant-merced in Valencia
county. The time of expenditure is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 379. NAVAJO NATION BROADBAND PROJECT
CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of information technology
project in Subsection 2 of Section 31 of Chapter 81 of Laws
2020 for which the time of expenditure was previously
extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 136 to acquire
easements and rights of way and to plan, design and construct
improvements, including conducting archaeological and
environmental studies and enhanced 911 and rural addressing,
for the broadband internet access project across the Navajo
Nation in McKinley, San Juan, Rio Arriba, Sandoval,
Bernalillo, Cibola and Socorro counties is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 380. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--WILDWOOD
LANE ROAD AND DRAIN IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the department of
transportation project in Subsection 8 of Section 38 of
Chapter 81 of Laws 2020 for which the time of expenditure was
previously extended in Laws 2024, Chapter 65, Section 48 to HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 138

acquire rights of way and to plan, design and construct road
and drainage improvements on Wildwood lane SW from Goff
boulevard to the end of the lane in the Atrisco community and
for other road projects in house district 14 in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 381. INDIAN AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT--SHIPROCK
CHAPTER MULTIPURPOSE VETERANS' CENTER CONSTRUCTION--EXTEND
TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of expenditure for the
Indian affairs department project in Subsection 74 of Section
26 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to plan, design and construct a
multipurpose veterans' center in the Shiprock chapter of the
Navajo Nation in San Juan county is extended through fiscal
year 2028.
SECTION 382. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--CONDERSHIRE
ROAD INTERSECTION WITH RIO BRAVO AND DENNIS CHAVEZ
BOULEVARDS--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The time of
expenditure for the department of transportation project in
Subsection 14 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws 2022 to
plan, design and construct improvements to Rio Bravo and
Dennis Chavez boulevards SW, including the intersection with
Condershire road, in Bernalillo county is extended through
fiscal year 2028.
SECTION 383. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--ISLETA
BOULEVARD IMPROVEMENT--EXTEND TIME--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--The
time of expenditure for the department of transportation HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 139

project in Subsection 17 of Section 36 of Chapter 53 of Laws
2022 to plan, design, construct and rehabilitate Isleta
boulevard SW from Malpais road to Luchetti road in Bernalillo
county is extended through fiscal year 2028. HTRC/HB 332/a/woec
Page 140